I chose comfort over fit when I bought (and continue to wear) this cozy sweater from Lefties; wearing with my skinniest AE jeggings, a scarf I got from a flea market (more on El Rastro soon) for only two euro; and, I bought the shoes. These elements seem hipster-inspired to me, but I think I’m just too far BC-prep to ever be classified as such…
Also this offer cannot be used in conjunction with gift vouchers won on blog challenges!!
This year I played secret Santa with the girls from the Lolita regulars table. I made the girl that I got a book-headdres. Yes, a book-headdress!
The Legend of Zelda: Link’s Awakening represented a surprising amount of firsts for the series back in 1993, when it was first released for the Game Boy. It was the first handheld Zelda game for starters, and was also the first game in the series not to feature Zelda herself, nor the Triforce, nor the setting of Hyrule. Though the game began development as an attempt to port The Legend of Zelda: A Link to the Past to the Game Boy (hah, as if that was possible…), it eventually became its own original story, a ‘gaiden chapter’ of sorts that instead became a follow-up/spin-off combo to A Link to the Past’s story, starring the same Link from that game on a new adventure after his successful defeat of archenemy, Ganon. Moving the series away from Hyrule, Link’s Awakening shifted the setting to Koholint Island, a mysterious place guarded by an entity called the Wind Fish, whom Link must awaken from a deep sleep to escape the place. I never noticed it as a kid, but LA has a bit of a… weird premise. Not only is the game objective literally to wake up a giant sleeping fish that is inside a big spotted egg (seriously), but you have to do so by going into the series’ usual helping of dungeons, and slaying the fish’s nightmare creatures to gain enchanted instruments that you must play at the egg to wake the fish up. I think it’s safe to say that this is one of the stranger Zelda games out there, but despite that, it’s still one of the best from both a gameplay and an innovation standpoint for the time. Not only did LA mark the series’ first successful translation to a handheld, but it also introduced several elements that would shape every subsequent installment in the series to date, including a fishing minigame, connecting each dungeon’s vital item to that dungeon’s boss fight (A Link to the Past did this once or twice, but it wasn’t always a mandatory element to bosses until this game), a trading sequence, and side quests that weren’t just looking for Pieces of Heart. LA was in fact so enjoyed and beloved, for good reason, that it was even re-released with a ‘DX Edition’ as a launch title for the Game Boy Color in 1998, which functioned simultaneously as both a re-release and an enhanced port. The cartridge could be played in an original Game Boy to completely replicate the original Game Boy release with no clear alterations, but if you put it in a Game Boy Color, you would unlock several bonus features, not the least of which was an entire bonus dungeon based around the theme of colours. Fittingly, LADX was also the first Game Boy Color game to be released on the 3DS Virtual Console, where players can enjoy it for the low, low price of $6. This was the first Game Boy Color game I ever owned, and only my second Zelda game, though my first ‘proper’ Zelda game, after my parents got me Zelda II on the NES to get my feet wet with (not the best starter game in the series, as I said in my review of that). This was a game I loved and replayed several times as a kid, and as an adult, I revisited it for Zeldafest, playing through it from start to finish again. I’m happy to report that this game is as amazing and enjoyable as ever, despite its strange storyline, which is kind of part of this game’s odd charm, really. Like A Link to the Past, this game is required playing for anyone that considers themselves a serious gamer, so if you happen to own a 3DS, you definitely need to make this a priority download off of the eShop, especially if you never got a chance to enjoy it on the Game Boy or the Game Boy Color back in the 90′s!
Floating so buoyant with milk-white foam on the waters.
Not exactly sure how this one got missed but here it is
Papa bought a thermometer and a barometer on one board today. The barometer says it is to be stormy tomorrow.
We seem to have become reliant on ending a meal with a mint chocolate! Unfortunately, our usual Mint Chocolate Crisps from Sainsbury’s Free From range haven’t been available for a while and we’re starting to have mint-choc withdrawal symptoms! So this afternoon I made a batch of chocolate mint thins. They must be the easiest thing to make but also look pretty enough to grace any event. If you have any fancy decorations such as gold leaf that would look lovely.
The TV is buzzing with the drone of relentless party political broadcasts featuring wooden performances from would-be MPs that few trust, and we're being bombarded with endless 'informed debate' shows.
but I realized that previous to these cardio commitments.
And I get this!
Last night was a little chilly here.....& it is way to early in the season for the nights to be getting cooler if you ask me....which you didn't. But hey it's my blog & if I want to voice my disgust at the lack of a real summer I jolly well shall ( all the wile blatantly disregarding the fact that I have spent the last few weeks stuck inside sorting things anyway.lol!).
I finished first round edits! There is much joy and celebration and lifting of weights off shoulders going on here. Whew! It was tough. My editor is brilliant, and pushed me in ways I didn't even know I could go. I am so excited with the changes I made! It occurred to me before I sent it off to her on Sunday that she's probably just as nervous to get them as I was to send them. I mean there are a million ways an author can mess up edits! It's kind of a comforting thought, though, to know that you're both working toward the same goal, and you're both nervous. Makes it easier to click send.
Give on final stir, cover the pan with a tight lid, reduce heat to low and cook for about 15-20 minutes or till the rice is well done.
I recently got to talk to Suzan Crowley about her role in ‘The Devil Inside’. Here, Suzan talks about what it was like working with the cast and crew on-set and how she got into acting in the first place…
It’s quite a strange sensation, being awake, looking out the window knowing the rest of the immediate world are probably sleeping. I can see right along my street and all the houses are in darkness, even the streetlight has stopped working directly opposite which really makes this street a dark place until the sun begins to rise.
Rasmussen College
Asohan Aryaduray, Chong Cheng Hai, Deborah Loh, Gobind Rudra, Jacqueline Ann Surin, Jahabar Sadiq, K Kabilan, KL Chan, Premesh Chandran, Steven Gan
Devotional: “Bring me your mind for rest in renewal….as your mind stops racing…”
I will start a new paragraph to tell you what was IN the sandwich. First, I will begin with the butter. Butter is a source of conflict in our house. When the weather is warm, my husband puts the butter in the fridge, which means you have to carve it off the block with a kitchen knife in slivers and lay it carefully on the bread and, to be honest, if I had time to be doing that, I'd have time to write blog posts. Another alternative is to put some in the microwave to 'warm', but this is easily misjudged, and one can end up standing in the kitchen with a bowl of bubbling butter, wondering whether to go and pour it over the head of one's still-sleeping husband. When the weather is cold, we leave the butter out of the fridge, but we put the oven on low to keep the downstairs warm and this ..... See previous sentence.
She converted, therefore, but in 1697 her lively wit and romans à clef, along with a number of scandals and rumours, provoked the King to send her to the Benedictine abbey of Gercy-en-Brie, where she wrote her memoirs and a number of other novels.
Even the men I’ve decided to date casually or spend time with, they have always lived far away.
My more than beautiful, new necklace by Grayling. I unconditionally love the rawness of the crystals, rough and uncut stones is an absolute favorite feature of mine when it comes to jewellery. I wore it with some newbies found in Thailand. Wouldn't the necklace look amazing under the collar of a button down shirt as well?
It made me so lonesome for my brother Pete--that is DOCTOR Peter Hoesing to you! My little bro is now Peter Hoesing PhD! I call him the Doctor of Drums. I hope that's okay with him. He is an inspiration to all of us. I only wish I could have been a little fly on an anthill when he was the drummer for the wedding while he was there.
Julia Louis-Dreyfus won 1 Emmy Award for her role as Elaine.
He offers an impressive swim move to play over the top of smaller defensive linemen while also possessing a rip move needed to split the crease in the line and penetrate the line of scrimmage. After disengaging from the blocker, Jerel locates the ball quickly in the backfield and has proven to be a punishing tackler capable of crashing down on the ball carrier or quarterback and driving them into the ground. When he isn’t able to work his way into the backfield, Worthy does a nice job of getting his hands up to block passing lanes, having batted six passes down at the line of scrimmage in the past three years. In the run game, he does a great job even when still engaged with the offensive lineman to extend one arm out, grab ahold of the runner with his great strength, and drag the ball carrier to the ground before he can accelerate through the hole. Jerel’s short-area explosion is outstanding; he’s displayed the ability to cross the face of the offensive lineman and win the leverage battle at the line of scrimmage. Even when he doesn’t make the play, his disruption in the backfield often breaks up the offensive play and allows for one of his teammates to swarm to the ball.
This is me:
So the day before Sigma was shipped out to boot camp, we had some business to attend to. That business being his going-away party/Baby shower for his wife and himself. That of course meant that we had to go and pick up gifts and such for the party. It was pretty important that we mad a good impression for this. Mainly because most of our crew are now pretty much considered honorary aunts and uncles. We swore to Sigma that we would help take care of Sita and little Cincinnati in anyway possible while he was gone, in fact I'm probably going to be in the delivery room with her on the big day. My hand will be crushed but sacrifices must be made. Besides, he'll know when shes in labor when he feels the force choke upon him when he's a thousand leagues under the sea.
But in the meantime, the answer, it seems, lies in a portable shop building in the grounds of the village hall. It's worked elsewhere, so why not here?
She and I took one look at each other and kinda fell in love. Which is way fun because, even though I could have given birth to her, it's fun to make new friends. And, as a side-note, it seems hard to make new friends the older you get. Why is this btw? That's a post for a different day.
I’m convinced my father knew nothing about the abuse. Now I find myself asking, “How could he not know? How could he miss the signs?”
Aldo Nova
During church he whispered some sort of comment in my ear that set my eyes rolling. My hand had been resting on his leg at the time. I picked it up and returned with one finger, tracing a large W on his thigh.
And even if we accept the premise that Jews and Jewish influence are primarily responsible for the mess we’re in, that doesn’t absolve whites from blame. The Jews didn’t invade America, Britain or any other country en masse and forcibly take over their institutions – they were invited by the natives. Prior to their emanicipation in the 19th century, Jews were despised and persecuted everywhere they went, and had little to no influence on the societies they settled in. That’s why the neoconservative description of the West as “Judeo-Christian” should make educated people laugh – Jews had about as much influence on pre-Enlightenment Europe as the Gypsies. Jewish emancipation was a product of liberalism, as the first European state to grant them full legal rights was revolutionary France in 1791. If Jews have fired the bullet into the head of white civilization, whites themselves are culpable for letting them touch the gun to begin with.
I intended for both beads to be purple, but the second one turned out to have too small a hole for two strands of size 20 thread to pass through, so I went with this silver one from my stash instead. Other than that, the tatting of the purple section went very smoothly and I only had to do it once!
And he scopes the environment
Tel: 081380006789 or 021-7207112
They may very well have chosen to continue the pregnancy. Period.
rabbit to wolverine with the tilt of a feather.
A screener at Ben Gurion has a pair of better options.
A great little skit from Billy Connolly---young man dancing with a strange girl at a local dance and she asked him what his star sign was---"Ah, Sagittarius, half man, half horse, licenced to shit in the street"
Ray Charles has been dead since 2004.
Today we will look at the WINTER. She has been described as "Shimmering ice with warm friendly fires. Elegance, poise and drama, independence, quietness with a touch of shyness."
Maybe it’s more appropriate to expose the ideology behind the political Left in Norway instead and challenge the political direction that they have staked out for the people of Norway, especially since many Norwegians are deeply opposed to their political agenda.
on the home front, we have gotten 2 of the 3 deer we have licenses for so far this fall.
James D. Savage and Herman M. Schwartz, “Cutback Budgeting,” Handbook of Government Budgeting. Roy T. Meyers, ed. (San Francisco: Jossey-Bass, 1999).
24. Do you hate anyone now that you didn't hate this time last year?
I hope my Gents will stir a little of your Steampunk Attitude.I would luuuurve to know what you think!!! Take a look at the wonderful ideas on the Design Team Blog for more inspiration and loveliness. I'm look forward to seeing your creations and thoughts.
I'm also handy to the kitchen for refreshment to keep me going and have a terrific view. OK, here's the view. You can see why I enjoy working here. These photos were taken on a very grey and gloomy day but even so it's an outlook I love. There's something serene about the water and especially the green of foliage that's soothing.
I told my aunt that my doctor was concerned about my thyroid and she said she'd put me on the prayer list at church. Friends on Facebook post problems and difficulties in their lives and ask for prayer. My husband was recently waiting for word on a new job he really wanted (which he got, yay!) and a part of me wanted to pray. Or send it out to the universe. Manifest it. Whatever, the word isn't as important as the practice.
One of my guilty pleasures is people-watching! Every time Balazs and I drop by our favourite cafe or simply walk about, I enjoy looking at people. I often try to spot if their personal style complement each other or do they go in totally different directions. Often, I speculate if the girl dictates the dress code or do they both contribute in some way. Also, its fun to brainstorm about what they’re like based on what they wear or how long they are together. (Especially, when you see an older couple who totally matches – adorable!). So, the other day I found a few snazzy duos that I simply adore and those that look totally cute together.
And I am braced for colder winds
I found this Robin’s egg shell on a walk the other day and carried it home to show my boys.
These boys love to explore, get muddy and play in the water. So they were bound to find this place!
Everyone pitched in with the food and we had hot broth, cheese, a "hot plate" plus chicken, beef, shrimp, bread and veggies. Instead of kissing the person to your left or right when you dropped your item in the fondue pot, we decided to do Jello Shots. Who knew that 11 people would go through 6 boxes of Jello before 9pm?
This Marlboro Lights case reminds me of the former city marketing slogan (trademarked) of the Hong Kong Tourism Board: Hong Kong, The City of Life! Isn't this deceptive? If, out of every 100,000 deaths in Hong Kong, 43 can be blamed on air pollution? I suggest the following slogan: Hong Kong people should get rid of pollution before pollution gets rid of Hong Kong people. Read more here. Hong Kong City of Fatal Attractions might be better? My beloved Hong Kong has now chosen, together with many other Asian cities I am sure, for the more generic Asia's World City. I know HK can do better than this.
Looking at this hill, I didn’t think I could finish it. It was 80% vegetables, but still a lot of chewing. Delicious!
*grabs a pillow and X-Box controller.*
This week I finished a watercolour painting of a Great Blue Heron which I named "Waiting Patiently":
Once they had their rare lead, the Toros went into preservation mode.
My husband cut the vines as high as he could and at least that may stop them from continuing to grow and killing the trees. And because I made such a big deal out of the whole thing, it probably contributed to him setting up the tent on the following day.
Janome Sewing Machines: Stitching A Touch of Creativity in Many Ways
The Williamsburgh Savings Bank tower at One Hanson Place — Brooklyn's tallest building until 2009, when it was surpassed by The Brooklyner — was designated a New York City landmark on Nov. 15, 1977. The building's famous clock tower is an iconic structure for Brooklynites, though it reminds most people of the dentist, as the 512-foot high building was filled for years with so many dental offices. It has since been converted into condos. Above are some photos of the building under construction. It was built between 1927 and 1929 (seems they were able to construct buildings faster then, no?). The top picture is the most striking. It shows the construction site right before the tower was built. It seems like too small of a space for that big building!
When satan tried to attack me yesterday he, made a grave mistake I truly believe God, allowed me to experience a small portion of the spiritual warfare around me because it shook me to the core and woke the warrior within me…
Two minutes later, she came into our bedroom with breakfast for both us! Scrambled eggs, toast, bacon and milk!
and your so thin like a Lizzy you come across fairly pissee
the living shall
As a reader pointed out last week, this indicator is now suggesting that we are at an important inflection point. However, because troughs correspond well to stock market lows, this indicator is not interpreted through a contrarian lense.
3 Steps to Converting Neighbors Into Loyal Customers
Warm Robiola Cheese with Pine Nuts, Olives, and Golden Raisins
That you will soon regret
Anna comments on a garden plaque resting on the Welsh dresser. It reads 'My Secret Garden'. This I bought the other day because it called to me, partly because The Secret Garden was one of my favourite books as a child, and partly, because I think each of us possesses a secret garden of self which just needs the right conditions to unfurl. We all need light and warmth and watering tears and tender hands. Once the snow disappears completely, I will place the plaque outside.
“You are now.”
In one of the few essays to explore why Pink et. al. seem to be hitting the same note, Pitchfork pop critic Tom Ewing made a surprising connection to the recent rise of social media. While search engines like Google can make you feel overwhelmed and lost in a universe of information, Facebook and Twitter make you feel special, unique, even Important. These days, he writes, “We are all born superstars: permanently consulted, endlessly special, but perpetually vanishing into the datamass too.”
P.S. 157 Benjamin Franklin
adapted from the Betty Crocker Cooky Book
Just as WoW is a throwback to nature, it is also a throwback to mythology and the belief in magic. Azeroth is a world of imagination that can seem more convincing than our Earth, and far more mystical.
Shoot, I forgot to take a before picture. Well, you can imagine what it looked like with out the pretty flowers, can't you?
and yet, I was able to move forward to the space on the board
Guess what?! Vogue just launched Vogue India, which is slated to be more colorful and vibrant than other Vogue editions. The cover features Indian models and actresses--as well as (randomly) Australian supermodel Gemma Ward.
The invention, electronic book security and copyright protection system, provides for secure distribution of electronic text and graphics to subscribers and secure storage. The method may be executed at a content provider's site, at an operations center, over a video distribution system or over a variety of alternative distribution systems, at a home subsystem, and at a billing and collection system. The content provider or operations center and/or other distribution points perform the functions of manipulation and secure storage of text data, security encryption and coding of text, cataloging of books, message center, and secure delivery functions. The home subsystem connects to a secure video distribution system or variety of alternative secure distribution systems, generates menus and stores text, and transacts through communicating mechanisms. A portable book-shaped viewer is used for secure viewing of the text. A billing system performs the transaction, management, authorization, collection and payments utilizing the telephone system or a variety of alternative communication systems using secure techniques. Here's the story.
A light, glimmering in one of those Second-Realm colours that wasn't quite yellow, appeared just above Taslin. Rel pushed his vision a little way into the future, watching the light move forward. Too far - all too easy to do - and the light winked out in stages, multiple overlapping lights disappearing into the sparkling background or fading as Taslin died in different ways.
Even when injured, the show must go on, no matter what. Even with injury on stage, Adam could have done more in his performance with the injury apparent.
But the cookie crumbles the other way too, (and that's how we both stay humble.) About two weeks ago, my colleague asked me if I was going to go to some "banks" after school. "Banks?" I said questioningly. "Like to rob them or something?" And she realized her error, and again we had a good laugh and joked about robbing some banks.
‘”While both (Calvinism and Arminianism) are forms of Protestantism, they take very different approaches to the doctrines of salvation (soteriology). Both believe in salvation by grace through faith alone (sola gratia et fides) as opposed to salvation by grace through faith and good works. Both deny that any part of salvation can be based on human merit. Both affirm the sole supreme authority of Scripture (sola scriptura) and the priesthood of all believers. However, Arminians have always opposed belief in unconditional reprobation–God’s selection of some persons to spend eternity in hell. Because they oppose that, they also oppose unconditional election–the selection of persons out of the mass of sinners to be saved apart from anything God sees in them.”
644 D-V/12/1973. “A Commentary on the Story of Cain and Abel.” Symposium on Renewing the Public Spirit: Explorations into the Personal and Political Life of Chicago, Brent House Ecumenical Center, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Just got the official notice that I’m a member of the Sweet N Sexy Divas! Very surreal to see my name on the roster and see my covers in the sidebar! I’ll be blogging on the 30th of every month (well, except for February – LOL!) So my first post is this month, on the 30th.
-1 large white onion, diced
tackles this issue, yet again, it’s different. I also noticed you have to be more or less connected to the
Well, today. Today was the last outdoor wedding of the season. And wow, did it go out with a heatwave and a gust. 85 degrees and 40-50 mph winds.
This doesn’t mean that phenomenology didn’t bedevil the naturalists from the first. The first major operationalist movement, behaviorism, had many variants, a lively theoretical literature and was an impressive generator of experimental protocols, but as a popular psychology (a theory of psychology intuitively persuasive to the average person) behaviorism was never really even a candidate for widespread acceptance, and the essential (popular) problem was, without doubt, behaviorism’s manifest failure to accommodate ordinary intuitions about qualia.
As you can see, I am wearing that shirt every day. Because when something's true, you should proclaim it from your chest every. single. day.
Helen sits down, and the class ends about a minute after that. Short lecture. As Helen makes her way down to the professor, it's revealed that they happen to be married. Wow, it gives new meaning to "easy A"! Helen gets jealous over a female student with what may actually be the world's most perfect butt, which is crazy, because Helen is Virginia Madsen, no slouch herself in the looks department.
The bullet pierced his side, and he died in Mr. Neesmith’s yard. His younger brother, Sha’von, then 18, ran through the onion fields in the dark, frantically trying to call his mother.
7:15- Go downstairs to make protein shakes for me and the hubby, and usually either leftovers of ours or some type of smoothie for the kids. It depends on how smoothly the morning goes for everyone.
Reinhardt will receive the 2011 gold medal in the Sydney Taylor Book Award’s Teen Readers Category for The Things a Brother Knows, published by Wendy Lamb Books, an imprint of Random House Children’s Books. Levi’s older brother Boaz is a military hero, and Levi has always lived in his shadow. Now Boaz is returning from war and it seems everyone thinks Levi is the luckiest boy in town. When Boaz refuses to engage with his family and barely leaves his room, Levi wonders if his brother will ever be normal. Committee member Rita Soltan said, “Reinhardt creates a moving portrayal of teen characters … She provides balance through Levi and Boaz’s Israeli grandfather, who served in Israel and has experienced war and suicide bombings. Realistic and subtle, her story unfolds with enough suspense, sardonic humor and pathos to keep readers focused until a conclusion that leaves room for pondering interpretation.” In 2007, Reinhardt earned a Sydney Taylor Honor Award for A Brief Chapter in My Impossible Life.
It means different things to different people. Rats in the shed, cockroaches under the sink, the creepy crawlies plagueing those with delirium tremors, the hallucinations of the addict but for her, it's something quite different.
Survive. We must wait until the final fragment
In case anyone is ever wanting an ultrasound...you know the first trimester kind...I suggest your mention the words 'lower left sharp abdominal pains' to your doctor.
And Twitter, dear Twitter, I can finally tweet out pics, something that would be cumbersome (impossible?) with my not-very-smart phone.
I saw "Girl with the Dragon Tattoo" on Friday night with my friend Julie.. It was soo good!! I hadn't read any of the books but I'm definitely going to do so now.
They are the perfect Sunday morning breakfast, right before you rake those leaves or spend an afternoon at the apple orchard. They will warm your heart.
I understand your perspective, but we are unable to waive the cost associated with your request. The process I have outlined is our standard practice. Take care - Annemarie Annemarie Seifert, Ph.D. Associate Vice Chancellor for Student Development
Gov.
“You might say I’ve overdone it, but I’ve sent those two.” “The Snow Mountain Hitmen- Yeti COOL BROTHERS”
Switching hats. Leaping from the voice of an eleven-year-old girl into the mind of a late thirty-something (if she’s not lying)—a woman battling writer’s block, backstabbing poets (alive, dead and suicidal), a mysterious seaside town, a virtuoso violinst who has never been seen wearing anything but a skeleton costume and who goes by the name of Death, horrible weather, a great-grandmother who doesn’t realize she’s nothing but ashes (not to mention barefoot), a rogue movie director with a thing for pith helmets, an “earthquake”, Fit Moms Inc., an actor with an assumed name pretending to be someone he once was, and an ex-husband who has somehow resurrected himself from an ocean grave, unfortunately returning with the same irritating habit of quoting Plato that he left with. By Act II of my novel, should my heroine be presented with the butterfly piece in the picture above, she would whisk it to her head and declare she was wearing her exploded brain as a hat. Butterflies for brains? She should be so lucky! That is—if I can pull off the plot and bring her properly to life…Shh. Don’t speak. Dooooon’t speeeeeeak…Oh, my.Perhaps I should turn in early tonight.
not the compromises and shortfalls
After my brother did the Brea 8K, I decided I would join him on his next race. I get my share of exercise playing catch a few times a week, but that is hardly enough to keep me in shape, considering I spend most of my time behind a computer or TV screen.
“Bonsai to me: a little tree in a container that touches my soul. If it speaks to my soul much it is bonsai art. It does not matter at all how it does it as long as it does it.” - Walter Pall
In the afternoon we'll be teaching 2 swapping sessions, the first will be taught by Colleen and is a project using canvas, paint and copic inks. And the second session is mine and will be featuring hand dying silks.
In recent days our reader and frequent commenter Kepiblanc has talked about the coming takeover of local European internet governance by the EU. His latest mention of it was on yesterday’s Fjordman post:
A melting pot of creatives, Stepdad has been fermenting their beat since early 2009 with their electropop/rock inception near Chicago (currently Grand Rapids), followed by their debut EP Ordinaire. Their melodies call forth an innocence of video games and lullabies with a pronounced rebellion of 80s and Swede-pop. This hybrid of material, paired with lyrical preservation and big live presence, has pounced the indie scene with a clean twist on experimentation.
Gregory: thanks for coming Eric
 Main Titles (Multi-Angle) With Commentary by Tim Miller of BLUR Studio
Life is a challenge face it
You Have More Alone Time With God
Eeep. It's awful to have to type that out and awful-er to have to read it. And awful-est (?) for you to read it.
Lehane says he used to haunt old bookstores to find Parker’s fiction, and met the late author at a book signing when Lehane was 19.
Almost summer, in other words.
One lovely soul took the bummer lamb I was raising. The bummer lamb who wasn't weaned. The bummer lamb who thought he was either a chicken or a person, and so would break out of the pasture to hang out with the chickens or on her front porch. I was so happy to not have to worry about Lambchop, and didn't want to have to prematurely "process" him. Lamb formula is expensive and we had already been through an entire bag. Thanks to her, our freezer is now full of the most amazing lamb you have ever experienced. This was all after mowing my lawn with a broken mower and bringing Jon dinner the night I was admitted to the hospital. She didn't ask what she could do...she just showed up. Thanks, Rickie.
Today is Friday. Time for my usual Independence Days check in. It's been a bit hectic around here so I hope I've got things to report.
I'm using the same vintage peach rayon satin that I used for my corset, and I'm also adding another lace overlay to the top half of my bra cups. Like I did with the corset, I have cut out lace pieces and basted them to my two outer upper bra pieces.
Take yesterday. I had panko (Japanese bread crumbs), some gnocchi (Italian potato pasta), lot of veggies ( I always have tons on hand) and whole mustard (a thoroughly Indian spice). The result was this awesome, flavorful pasta dish that is treat for the eyes, heart and the belly. Take a look at the
You can’t stop time from passing or slow it down no matter how hard you try. I hope to god I never have a mid-life crisis, although sometimes I wonder if I’m having a mid-20’s crisis (but that’s another post). All I can do is live for today, tomorrow, and the day after that.
- In Victoria Australia it is forbidden to wear pink hot pants after mid-day on a Sunday.
Don't forget that tomorrow is the last day to play along with All Things Unity Summer Feeling Challenge. The new challenge will be up Sunday with our New GT team and sponsor for August. I hope you can come and play with us. We would love to have you.
This is from the day we moved in...
Even the side flaps were embossed! I lightly applied Vanilla craft ink onto the embossing to make it pop. Then I filled the bag, rolled the top, and clipped on the tag!
The cookies, by the way, are delicious.
Frame - A frame is one turn.
You never have to worry what others may say.
P.S. if you haven't fanned our facebook page, go over and give it a like. It's a lot easier to post small updates over there, so I'll probably post daily there and once a week (or more!) over here.
Obviously they were trying to silence Ai Weiwei a number of ways and finally took a drastic measure that brought a lot of negative attention. But they are still pretending to be good cops and hoping we'll buy it. A classic example of "saving face."
Add now the cooked mutton pieces to the veggies,cook everything for 5minutes, now add the grounded paste and cook everything in simmer until the oil gets separates, add enough water and cook everything until the mutton pieces get well cooked,finally add the mint leaves and put off the stove...serve hot..
I'm not so sure that the first one entirely fits the bill of the pastel colours, but as I made it, I thought I'd share it with you, and I just loved the image so much. I hope you agree!
Being the weakest and smallest state on the Korean peninsula compared to Gorguryeo in the north and Baekje (百濟) to the west, the Silla kings had long realized the importance of immigration in order to survive.
The watercolour illustrations by Gaby Hansen are just beautiful. This book would make a great gift for a pre-schooler; my littles really enjoyed this book, and I'm sure it will become a favourite read aloud.
BLDGBLOG: A Mexican!
My mother said I should stop watching CSI and Charmed because they are the reasons why I dream about monsters. Dreams full of darkness and jam-packed with hairy legs, sharp teeth, drooling green saliva filled me with restless sleep.
If you want to be on our e-mail list to volunteer or recieve updates please e-mail radkidcare-at-gmail.com.
Oddly, this type of judgement sometimes swings the other way. With Meryl Streep portraying the toothy bouffant Iron Lady on international screens and renewed discussion about Britain's now-frail ex-Prime Minister, I feel I must mention that Margaret Thatcher is my neighbour.
I was able to show some of our eggs to which I received a comment “did you dye these?”
He forgave everyone else on this planet of their sins against me. Really.
After the wedding, Chef and I went to his restaurant to listen to a band play and hang out before we went home. Chef was our DD, and I was pretty set on free wedding drinks (read: I was tipsy. Maybe bordering on drunk. But not crazy drunk or anything.). Turns out, the band was my absolute favorite local band, so I was a very happy camper.
Elijah: "What's the Air Force?"
They just write you off as anti-social,
” He loves me or he loves me not, never did matter to me, nor it will,
The following message is sent on behalf of David H. Farrar, Provost and Vice
You know the saying, “Absence makes the heart grow fonder?” Well, it’s true, especially when you are eighteen and quite stupid. My boyfriend, Rick, was a junior at Michigan State University, and I was a measly freshman, far away at Fairmont State College in Fairmont West By God Virginia. I missed him.
Combine all ingredients in a large bowl and toss to coat. Spread onto a foil-lined baking sheet. Bake at 300 degrees F for 15 minutes; stir, rotate sheet 180 degrees, and bake for an additional 15 minutes or until well-toasted. Cool completely and store in an airtight container.
256 MB of interior recollection is definitely offered seeing that regular, even so end users have the choice spend time at this built with Micro SD card slot machine game and also the installation of the memory card associated with up to a stunning 32 Gigabyte. Lots connected with songs, online video media videos, paperwork along with documents might be kept within this which is guaranteed to be able to be sufficient pertaining to Details Storage space needs of the majority of customers. The internal yellow pages can easily shop an apparently unlimited volume of records along with fields and in addition incorporates this ever preferred Photo call attribute which allows customers to help designate the picture to help a unique speak to in the phone book.
Medion has put the emphasis where it counts, instead – on the inside. The Erazer is powered by the Core i7-2670QM processor which was launched towards the end of last year and is one of the Intel’s fastest laptop chips.
In this case it is understood, seen, known, as all encompassing Presence, experienced as Light, beyond light, clear Brilliance beyond any conceivable light or brilliance, which is every’where’ and fills and suffices all because simply it is All-That-Is, there is nothing that It is not. It is understood and experienced as Presence because it is the ultimate Aliveness of Pure Being, and the ultimate Awareness of pure Consciousness and
The biggest fly in my frankincense about all this is that I’ve also been told a whole bunch of other stuff about what’ll be good for me after I’m dead. When I compare all that other stuff to this particular claim about Jesus, it all looks damn near identical as far as I can tell, in style, conviction, and realism, while being totally different and mutually exclusive in content. Surely the least that a respectable omnipotent deity could do is to make his own divine word stand out a bit, from the numerous tribal legends and other stuff that people just made up. Especially if there’s really so much riding on it, and if God actually gives a crap what happens to our eternal souls (which most religions claim he does, though they call it ‘benevolence’ more commonly than ‘giving a crap’).
Wild-caught dolphins gradually experience the atrophy of many of their natural behaviors and they are deprived of the conditions that allow them to express their cultural traits, such as their unique foraging techniques. Viewing captive marine mammals gives the public a false picture of the animals’ natural lives. To restrict dolphins in a tank is abusive, considering their ecology. The dark side of the captive industry is not very known in Japan, and aquariums are regarded as educational facilities. Children learn to view dolphins as dependent on humans rather than as competent and independent. The “needs” of the visiting public and the greed of the aquarium-owners come before the need of the dolphins. The natural intelligence of the bottlenose dolphins have made them easy to train to do tricks, and dolphins in captivity are used predominantly for no other reason than public entertainment.
my trust
-rest 1:30
Once I got my cramps to subside, I dealt with exploding blisters on my toes around mile 16, and an annoying side stitch and nausea in the last few miles of the race. Ah, marathoning. The differences between my reaction to this race and the last one though, were huge - I really learned to run through pain and discomfort, and to push myself, in the last year.
As they are developing their personalities we are finding that they are extremely naughty. Sissy is the trouble maker of the group. I heard her squealing the other day and thought that Buddy was playing too hard with her. When I finally saw them, they weren't even touching, she was just carrying on, trying to get him into trouble. ("Mom - he's looking at me!") Sissy is also much braver than Buddy. She was the first one to try stairs and run into the neighbor's yard. Buddy is a big lug now compared to her. She can jump on the couch, but he can't even though he's bigger. When you sit down, Buddy is content to sit BESIDE you, but Sissy has to sit ON THE HIGHEST POINT on your body (my boobs).(That last statement makes me think my boobs must grow out the top of my head ...) That's so not comfortable. They both POOP A LOT (and it stinks)! We think we are doing really good with taking them outside and then they come inside and go to the bathroom. What's up with that?
I took a quick gander in my collection and found two polishes that coluld have been close Zoya Zanna and OPI Lucky Lucky Lavender. I could tell from the bottle that Zanna, while a similar shade is a fair bit darker, so I didn't even bother swatching. Lucky looked close, but as you can see it is a brighter shade and lacks any dusty tones.
When crust is done, immediately spread apples over it, and sprinkle with streusel. Bake for 20-25 minutes, until streusel topping is light brown and crisp (mine needed 32 minutes in the oven).
So far, parsing hamlet as “ham-lette” as “little pigs” has not led me to any welcome insights—or unwelcome ones, for that matter.
Strong black coffee in a mug
All interesting, but at the schools and in the classrooms there are other significant benefits to online payment systems. Staff have told us that with “cashless”, teachers no longer spend the first ten minutes of the day playing bank teller. With cashless, pizza day volunteers and office staff are no longer conscripted bank security guard. At least as important in mostly affluent Halton, the kid who woud other wise be quietly munching his cheese and ketchup sandwich on pizza day “’cause I hate pizza” enjoys a slice with his classmates because his name is on the list. Cashless can discretely reduce obvious socio-economic differences for kids in our elementary and secondary schools.
Until then I'm using two tumblrs to keep track of my interests and research:
"Whatever, God knows her name....and He knows I love the dancing song."
Stamp - None
I should have looked up before I started celebrating. I should have at least remembered that when I went into the room, I left linoleum, not grass.
I still haven't finished going through the EOBs (Explanation of Benefits) because my disgust was too overwhelming. Now, I know that I could just let them fight it out, because either way, I was covered - and the insurance company covering both places of employment is Blue Cross Blue Shield. So ... it's fighting itself. Shoot! I had even called them, trying to get them to terminate the first plan ... but they hadn't heard from the House Member, my former employer, into my third or fourth month in the other plan.
I am loving Georgina Chapman on Project Runway All Stars. They should replace Nina Garcia with Chapman in the next season. She has great insight, helpful criticism, and very supportive of each designer’s vision. Plus, she’s stunning and the camera loves her.
Hi again! When I first started eating gluten free I was at a loss. So much stuff has gluten in it that I had no idea what I could eat. So for those of you who are in the same boat, here's what I've been eating!
For example, even before the 1Care programme is finalised, there are already protests.
My last reflection over the last couple of days has involved thinking a lot about my family and the last few years. Things haven't been easy. My wife thought three and a half years I was going to be seriously impaired when my back finally gave out in the shower two days after returning home. It actually makes me emotional even now as I write this. To be able to do this now is just so surreal at time. The stupid thing is tonight I found myself getting frustrated at a number of things. I don't know just something's today were getting making me pissed and frustrated. Some little things some things to do with the rowing and other that really have nothing to do with me. Stupid really as I know I am in the middle to selection and building up to these moments always has me getting more sensitive. So finally I just stopped and thought stuff me I can't actually believe I am here after Beijing and feeling as good as I ever have and ready to fly, and yet my lack of appreciation just for my situation had me getting caught up in stuff that doesn't matter.
48. Run off from coffee plantations decimates rain forests, kills fish, pollutes lakes and streams and eventually finds its way to the ocean. Coral reefs thousands of miles out from shore are dying from this pollution
When we were about to join Malaysia, she told me that we would not succeed because the Umno Malay leaders had such different lifestyles and because their politics were communally-based, on race and religion.
The Bruery Saison DeLente
Click on the pictures to get a bigger view of it. Also check out the the design team's blogs for more details about their cards.
You must be follower only if you want, if you believe we are interesting and good crafters and not compulsorily... ok? ;)
Working at an event like that is something that I really like to do. It's so different from what I do at my "regular" job. It's like working at the Gift Mart in Atlanta or on the vendor floor at a scrapbooking convention. If anyone is looking for help at a similar event, please let me know!!
No surprises in YYI1 really. The big hits Live and Let Die, Don’t Cry, and November Rain stand head and shoulders above the rest.
You say in an introduction that you got the idea for this book when you went to a butterfly park with your daughter.
Don't be afraid
No room has been left untouched in my house. Anna is an equal opportunity messer upper. She loves to empty the contents of her room and spread them all around my house on a daily basis. I pick up two pairs of shoes, she brings out three more pairs. I pick up a book, 10 more books magically make their way out of her room.
So here's my random want to do list for summer 2012:
Will readers like Athee? I think they’ll admire her strengths and determination to succeed in a profession dominated by men. They’ll be moved by her motivation and efforts to keep those she loves safe. Readers will enjoy the new relationship aspect she brings to the story when her world and Byron’s collide.
total cost of outfit: $126
Who knew that wearing big bulky shoes made you inefficient as a runner?
“From the Kansas Department of Transportation: The Quivira Road to eastbound I-435 ramp will be closed beginning at 9 a.m. Wednesday, Feb. 29, for reconstruction work for the US-69 and I-435 project.
Job 13:23–How many are my iniquities and sins?
So even if I am the odd unsettled relative, my sister and my parents understand. I will dedicate this next set of photos to them, for their love and in getting me to places I couldn't have gotten to by myself. I look forward to sharing these images with you soon.
None of this will have any of the beauty it has now,
Here they were, the apertures:
In general, politicians resist relinquishing their ability to intrude in peoples' lives, but liberals reject the idea that the smallest possible government is the best government. What would it take to change their minds about that?
Souvenirs along part of the boardwalk in Sopot. The guy in the distance on the right spoke good English and was the hotness, as lots of Polish guys seem to be, so I tried smiling and chatting with him but he just started giggling and blushing. I’m forever hopeless.
6. I once purposely put gum in my hair to see if peanut butter really took it out.
Quit crying
If there’s one thing you should remember while traveling, it’s to do whatever YOU want to do. In the end, it’s your time, money and experiences. Don’t let someone else cramp your style. Take your trip by the horns and for once, do everything that you’ve wanted to do.
Desk drawers tend to be dumping grounds. Another way to streamline your home office is to organize your desk drawers. Start by taking everything out of it and sorting through the contents and placing in groups (i.e. pens, note pads, paper clips, etc.). Items that belong in other areas of the home should go in a box temporarily and put away at a later time.
“As a Navy SEAL Astronaut Lawyer, I use the mass market edition of Hard Magic every day.” *
Harvey: Hmmmm.
P.S. If you’re an active blogger and are interested in participating in the “Dream Home” series, e-mail me at paloma@ladolcevitablog.com!
"Long may your Jib draw" - A good wish for the future.
The layout I am about to preview is one that has been sitting for a while now, not constructed the way I wanted so was put to the side so when I felt I had the right embellishments etc I could finally finish it. Its a layout of my darling girl and my cousin Keirin. The photo was taken on Gramps 87 Birthday party. Dakota and Keirin just love to Huggle, so I thought an appropriate title for the page. I decided to use some favorite nail polish to create my plain chipboard lettering into something glossy, cheeky I know, but the result is fantastic;)
It’s been impossible for me to settle on a single style. In fact, feeling as though I should develop a single style, a painter’s identity, so to speak (such as repeatedly painting florals on white bureaus), is what killed the love for me a few years ago.
Likewise the Kuravas were born from the nectar kept in a container( kalash) to raise a race of a hundred brothers born to Gandhari wife of Dhrithrashtra in the story of Mahabharata. This has resemblance to the current stem cell technology when the single foetus of Gandhari was broken into hundred and one pieces and preserved in ‘Kalash’ very akin to the test tubes of modern times. These were incubated till the birth of children under supervision. And thus a hundred sons and a daughter called Duhshala were born!
Well folks...the time has come for me to offer out some 'sweetness'
to introduce subjects/ideas at age appropriate times
such as boots, blankets and bullet
After finding him on the side of the road, Hoyt and Jessica took Jason back to his house and put him to bed. Still feeling guilty about glamouring Hoyt into forgetting she drank someone else’s blood, Jessica pulled away from him when he tried to hug her. Hoyt decided to stay with Jason that night, presumably so he wouldn’t have to go home with Jessica.
11 developed
One of the stars of those great Barca teams of the mid 90s was a midfielder named Pep Guardiola. He was a playmaking maestro directing the Barca attack from the middle of the pitch. He grew under Kruyff and developed into one of Barca’s finest players. Then, shortly after the Dream Team reached their peek, several youths arrived at the La Masia Academy, the footballing academy for future Barca stars that is run by the club. Three in particular stood out from the rest: Midfielders Xavi Hernandez and Andres Iniesta, both Spanish, and an Argentine youth named Lionel Messi.
Megan Draper, however, doesn’t seem interested in having children. She’s likely been on The Pill since she hit puberty. She cares more about her career than her need to breed. This sounds more like the 24-year-old women I know. This is the woman we recognize inside of us. Maybe that’s why we want to tear her down so much. Because we, as women, are hardest on ourselves.
Martin Luksan v Petrus van der Let, Case C-277/10, European Court of Justice (ECJ), 9 February 2012
Off to browse more yarn-alongs and gather inspiration.
Even in middle school I wanted to lose weight. I was just a bit pudgy–not even noticeable, really, but you know how it is. I felt “so fat”. And I hadn’t been raised with any sort of exercise habits, so that added to the guilt problems.
As a member of Generation Bleu, Ao will be protected from all those who want him and his mecha. We can also look forward to more interations between him and the somewhat haughty and spoiled Fleur and Elena, whose senses of smug entitlement he cannot hope to match (though you neve rknow, as piloting Nirvash may go to his head too.) Personally we wish Naru was going with him to keep keep him grounded, but her mysterious illness (perhaps caused by scub coral particles) would put her at risk.
When we started Vintage Graphs we said that we were not going to include “ratings”. We wanted to differentiate ourselves from the “good/bad” dichotomy and just state what a wine tasted like. As I’ve discovered, a wine can taste like “cherry” but it can be light, sour, unripe, overripe, etc. So with this graph I have instituted (for the first time) a THUMBS UP/THUMBS DOWN rating system.
Oh dear yes, let’s cross one more place we’ve bullied into submission off our list shall we? They have no right to run their club as they see fit. Silly them! My God, my eyes actually hurt from the amount of rolling they have done as I wrote this column.
after all there was
I think I’m cured!”
You fashioned the paths that your footsteps have trod.
Star and angels gave the sign.
I had originally envisioned this post being a compendium of the rehearsal tracks in question: two early lyric takes on "In A Lonely Place", three mostly-finished versions with the "final" lyric, and then the "Ceremony" rehearsal - all mastered for release. What surfaced on the official 12" was the next-but-last take of "IALP" and the previously-known "Ceremony" rehearsal, with the 12" leaving on the cutting room floor the other known takes of "IALP". We used the Recycle post to surface the full version of "IALP" as excerpted on the Heart and Soul box set, as a "bonus" to the tracks used on the 12".
Meanwhile, I hope you enjoy these...
- Schertz Air conditioning replacement / Schertz AC replacement
regularly, in a room just at the top of the stairs from my bedroom - in
8. What is one thing I would change about myself?
The information I found showed men to be four times more likely to commit suicide than women. Divorced and separated individuals were more likely than married. But in what category would the man whose viewing we went to be categorized. He was neither separated nor divorced, yet he chose the option of suicide for the same reasons as men in those categories. Which begs the question of how many men in the married category would actually fit the same demographic as those in the other two because of the reasons behind the action? If Dave had followed through, he would have fallen into the married category as well. So where the percentage rate is higher for the separated and divorced men, the numbers are still quite high for married men, much higher
‘Writing wasn’t easy to start. After I finally did it, I realized it was the most direct contact possible with the part of myself I thought I had lost, and which I constantly find new things from. Writing also includes the possibility of living many lives as well as living in any time or world possible. I can satisfy my enthusiasm for research, but jump like a calf outside the strict boundaries of science. I can speak about things that are important to me and somebody listens. It’s wonderful!’
We discovered asian heaven below the Hard Rock Cafe. I cant help but feel like I was supporting child labour in some way as i delightfully sifted through racks of semi normal shaped clothing. I found a gorgeous ruffled cap sleeve sweater that tied in the front in a wonderful earthy camel colour for $2.99. no thats not off by a decimal place or two….$2.99. followed by a $9 shirt and 2 pairs of $14 black skinny jeans that fit great. Like I said, I felt guilty as I walked out with my much needed work purchases I couldnt help but feel I was supporting child labour somewhere. But it went to find ME work and that had to count for something.
I have toyed with the thought that the end game of the abortionists is to fulfill the false premise of the 60′s and 70′s that there was a possibility of sex without consequences. I have run across this article which has the discussion in detail. An excerpt:
Again every f*cking story focuses on every other f*cking disorder and not Autism. Jeez, never trust any liberal that supports autism causes and NEVER trust the MSM or Mainstream Media to cover this cause ether. And that’s what it is now – a cause.
I’ve had my moments, too, but nothing quite so serious… yet. I always thought to myself, the brother did the cop thing, sissy did the running away thing, so my theory was, all that left me was to get pregnant. It seemed to fit with the scale of things and they’d covered all the other bases so, logical, yes?
The Forgetting Curve, the sequel to Memento Nora, continues the story of teens in a world where if something bad happens, all your memories can be erased with a pill. But, things have gone even farther....
In Gran Canaria, you can see a house built to 80 square metres, with three bedrooms and a bathroom, available for 66,700 euros, a discount of 62%.
Guides, they have had a bit of a hold back however no longer. Wood Elf and Beastmen guides will be posted likely in video and written format with more indepth views in the written section.
I need to post about what's happened recently but I'll do that later. Right now, I want to talk about an entry in the Houston Post about the closing of a local lesbian bar. This isn't news-bars open and close all the time (more close than open in this economy, though). But one of the comments got me thinking:
At 50 miles, with frozen fingers and soaked to the skin, I felt a loss of control to the rear wheel and looked down to see a flat tyre. Not seeing the need to make Andy freeze himself further I let him go and pulled over to carry out the repair. Being a brand new tyre it was a complete bugger to remove, and I was almost in tears on the umpteenth occasion when a tyre lever pinged off across the grass verge. A number of riders passed by asking if I was ok, to which I shouted back “Yes, thanks” – this was clearly a lie.
Daily Word
ATRI considered how the safety programs within individual motor carriers contribute to this relationship between violations and crash risk. Anecdotal information was gathered by interviews with “top tier” fleets and suggest that there’s been a shift from 2005 to 2011:
Now the time came to take my measurements....hind sight being 20/20 I really should have done this when I started WW's back at the end of February and not been afraid to look at those numbers. After all that is what they are a number and a number that I plan to shrink over time. So my plan is to track my measurements on a monthly basis using the last Sunday of each month. I
Their hearts are innocent right now and I can already see a passion for God. You know that Brylee is our worship queen. She knows the songs, she raises her hands, and she truly feels when she does it. It is all she has ever been around and to her it's "normal"....even though many would say it's not. To her it is normal....and what a joy that brings to my heart.
The great thing about .357 magnum revolvers, is that they can shoot the much less powerful (and much cheaper) .38 special ammunition (.357 magnum is basically stretched and overpowered .38spl in a tougher brass case). They can also be made quite small. I have a pocket sized 5 shot .357 magnum revolver that only weighs 10 ounces empty, and about 12 ounces loaded. It goes into my front pants pocket in the morning and doesn't come out until I go to bed; and I barely notice it at all.
So I did more of a formal relaxation meditation today, focusing on my breathing for a few minutes, that giving each part of my body attention, breathing through any tension, focusing on relaxing...releasing tension with each breath. The I began focusing on the solar plexus chakra. Again for those that are unfamiliar:
So, put simply, if it is brewed in cold temperatures, with a bottom hugging yeast, matured for a while and served very cold with pizza or chips - lager. Top fermenter with a penchant for warmer places and ready to drink even while still ‘alive’ and goes well with pork pies and complaints about the weather - ale.
To drink, we'll serve plenty of tea and home-made still lemonade, and in the evening we'll light lanterns all around the garden, bring out wine and beer, and if too much of these are imbibed, no doubt Frodo's "bendy-knee chicken-dance" from the film will ensue...
I'll spend my whole paycheck on some old wreck and brother I can name you a few
Make any purchase of $25 or more at CooperandMe.com and get FREE SHIPPING now through December 15. MUST USE THIS CODE @ Check Out: COOPERBLOG
9 Frankly, Mr. Shankly
“Where are you now? Can you come over later please?” I asked.
How does your denomination foster local church cooperation? How effective is this approach? Did your denomination adopt this approach because "that's the way we've always done it"? Or because it is the most effective approach?
* Payment History 30%
When (and if) Michael Selsor’s death sentence is carried out Tuesday, Oklahoma will only have enough supply of its lethal injection cocktail to execute one more inmate.
pour over noodles and mix
Talking New Media reports many newspapers are reaching a tipping point where they can now claim more digital circ than print.
The rest of CGGVeritas Services (Malaysia) Sdn Bhd’s shares are held by the parent company.
We got to Blackmons house in Tallapoosa around 5 am. It was dark one hour ride from airport to their house. Kids only got 2 hours of sleep and that is it. My friends mom and dad welcomed us with open arms and invited us in to have some breakfast . Pancakes, eggs, bacon:):):) YUMMM:):):) After that we tried to get some sleep.
October 28, 2006 Clip No. 1308
Revlon Cream Blush in “Pinched”: This is part of Revlon’s new Gucci Westman Collection. I have never owned a cream blush because to be quite frank, they scare me. I just think it is so much easier swoosh some powder on your cheeks but this has totally transformed my thoughts on cream blush. First of all, this color is GORGEOUS- it’s a bright peach that blends in so well. There were three colors, all are bright, but from what I have heard they might look intimidating but they all blend in amazingly. I only purchased one, but I plan on going back for a second one because I’m hooked! To see the full Gucci Westman collection click here: http://www.revlon.com/Revlon-Home/Featured-Collection/Escapism.aspx
Many have said that The Slanted Door has lost something along the way, and I unfortunately have to agree. Put simply, the current incarnation of the restaurant is cold and impersonal. The décor consists of stark colors with little warmth, modernistic furniture with no sense of refinement, and a palpable dearth of noise-muting fabrics.
I told Sarina that it was too bad that the little girl had a mommy who didn't take good care of her.
Shortly after he turned 57, he began having pain in his left hand and was diagnosed with osteoarthritis, primar­ily affecting his fingers. At first, his symptoms were well-controlled and he was able to continue his practice on a full-time basis. Over the next 12 to 18 months, however, his condition gradually worsened, making it evident that he was nearing the point where he would no lon­ger be able to perform such procedures.
Fast forward to Saturday: my long run day. I was nervous - it felt like a small giant I had to defeat. My goal was to do 6km with a run 3 minute, walk 1 minute method. In 45 minutes I not only met my goal but surpassed it by .24km! I had Wake Up by Arcade Fire playing at the time, so it felt pretty epic. I almost cried...I never thought I would ever run that far. I have not felt this good about doing something physical since I gave birth to Finn. It felt THAT good. I walked back to my car with a big smile on my face.
Tried some Physical Therapy. On that eval my spine showed scoliosis and my pelvis is being pulled by my right ass muscles outward and upward. No results of a positive nature during therapy which consisted of electricity, heat, cold, even traction and of course stretches and the like. Oh, and the gentle touch of a man's hands on my buttocks.
Marinate fish. In a shallow dish, place fish. In a small bowl mix together olive oil, lime juice, cilantro, jalapeno, salt and pepper. Pour over fish and coat fish with marinade well. Set aside for thirty minutes.
Did you know I have another blog? Bet you didn't. It isn't open and was started way before this one. This one started on 26/11/2007 and the other one started on 21/2/2007. It inspired Tandleman's Beer Blog, but is really just a personal diary, not about beer. Why am I telling you this? Well here is an extract from a couple of weeks ago:
Many powerful souls have reincarnated in this era, with a lot of power. This is true on both sides, the light and the dark. High magic is at work on both sides. Things will change, but it is up to the people how difficult or easy it is for the changes to come about.
Here is what I used to make the cards:
"snow on snow"
Overall Penny Arcade Adventures Episdoes 1 and 2 are quite enjoyable games if a little short. Each episode costs about $12 on steam and whether you think that is a good price or not is up to you to decide. Personally I’d suggest waiting for a sale or buying the episodes in a bundle, it’s cheaper than buying then individually.
Celibidache became director of the Munich Philharmonic Orchestra,
8And the Lord said to Joshua, Have no fear of them, for I have given them into your hands; they will all give way before you.
Under the Sun of Satan (Maurice Pialat, 1987) - "The style of the film, in examining these crises of faith and suffering, is stark and rigorous. Pialat's images are often dark but always clearly defined; even the shadows are crisp and hard. The most striking sequence is Donissan's walk from his parish to a nearby community where he's supposed to be visiting... Pialat's tranquil long shots seem to be mocking the priest, celebrating the beauty of nature even as the priest stumbles and staggers, weighed down by invisible burdens. At nightfall, these beautiful landscapes become dark and eerie, bathed in blue light."
Teal: Miles 13-16: I see our cheer squad!! Finally, a non-running human I know. I think I was still basically out of it and internally freaking out. At this point I am thinking, “there is no way in hell I am finishing this damn thing.” I high five Brent because he was the closest and hand them my arm sleeve because it was too cold to hold on to. At this point I am mile per mile. Just get to the next one, just get to the next one.
If you’ve read this far, I suppose I owe at least a little bit of an explanation.
This does not give anyone blanket authority to just say Jesus in any circumstance, no matter how good it might seem, and assume it will then be as asked. We ask in full dependence of God, trusting Him to act according to His plan for His glory and our good. Does that always mean cancer is healed? No. Why? It is not always clear, but someday it will make sense. When, as Chris Tomlin puts it in one of his songs, “our faith shall be our eyes” and we see Jesus in all His glory.
I was the bridegroom, taking the world into my arms.
She offered soothing words with out being condescending
So without further ado - this is what I conjoured up for the challenge, which can also be seen on the Funky Hand challenge blog 'Get Funky' HERE
Our masks are supported by kevlar or other materials now, because porcelain breaks pretty easily and my mask has deflected bullets before, saving my life!
Match 5: Alberto Del Rio defeated Zack Ryder
Crispy Pita Chips
Please see the customer reviews of Ciphertex 2.5-Inches 500 GB High Performance External Hard Drive with AES 256-bit Hardware Encryption CX-2500E – 500GB in the merchant’s website by visit the link below.
Butterfinger Wannabes
1) Do NOT wear too much eye liner
I have to admit, that I am a total scarf fanatic. No matter what time of the year it will be seldom for anybody to see me without. I guess I am like that for more than 10 years now. And if I do not wear a scarf or some other lighter cravat, I feel like getting a sore throat very quickly. It is odd, I know! :)
The space between us and
still waiting
Here's what I observed:
I'm making a Target run today to find some jumbo Easter eggs to send in the mail to my nephews and nieces on vacation at their grandparent's house. I got the idea here and think it's brilliant. Anyone ever try this? I'm interested to see what they say at my post office...
And Frank takes Chad with him... and RAISES HIM IN PARIS!
I have been questioned about whether or not my rheumatoid arthritis was a factor in the fracture, but I am confident that if RA was to blame for my stress fracture it would have happened while I was marathon training, in the marathon, or for sure at the 24-Hour Relay. I cannot blame it on anything but my own lack of judgment. I have used some cortical steroids to treat RA, but rarely and not in high doses or for long periods of time. My bones do not show thinning and I have put them to the test before. This is not an RA related injury and in my life the benefits of running still vastly outweigh the risk of injury.
Our second Gala in the evening was for their Irish dance. It too is a new studio for us. We had outgrown what was available at our last studio (where we had been for 4 years) and the quality of the Irish they had taken there was ridiculous compared to the level with Miss Amy. I toured several programs before making my decision and I have been so pleased. Amy is incredible in her knowledge and her methodology of instruction. The girls learned a soft shoe and a hard shoe piece this year, both with very complex choreography. Neither girlie was keen on the hard shoe- it was just well...hard! They loved the soft shoe piece. We will be taking Amy's intensive class over the summer and then they both plan on auditioning for the new mini troupe. Currently Amy had a junior and senior group that does community service and performs in demonstrations, parades, senior citizen homes, schools and festivals. She has decided to add an age 8-12 group beginning in the fall and suggested the girlies use the summer class to sharpen their knowledge and skills and audition. Teagan is very interested. Piper goes back and forth. We'll see.
I'm just a girl
Other facts that you may not know about Thistles:
The summer has set in and it is hot beyond belief already - what happened to the slight cool wind that was blowing last week???? The l'il one doesn't understand why the weather has turned so hostile and he has to stay in during the day? Also, the appetite has suddenly shrunk and all he wants to do is sip on liquids and munch on something light. He is isn't much of a fruit fan so have been thinking of various ways to get some fruit into his diet but making sure the snack / food is wholesome (using whole wheat, puffed rice and oats) and these is a "YUMMY" element to it otherwise, it doesn't get eaten! Made some fresh mangoes and cream lollies, strawberry and yogurt mousse but those posts are for another day!
Interestingly, traditionally conservative land holders are mobilising against the loss of valuable agricultural land, and the untested effects on water tables and resulting contamination from coal seam gas mining.
Sally: But you thought it was good once.
Dear Mom's Best Products,
So the good mother slowly accedes to the demands of the market. She reluctantly lets the hurricane that is the childhood industrial complex engulf her child, and consequently her family, in its swirl of increasingly time intensive sports teams, music lessons, public service activities, clubs, etc. in hopes that this sacrifice will be enough for the child to snare one of those golden positions.
Yesterday we had the day off from school …YAAAAAA! It was Labor Day here and therefore a free day to do no labor, which I didn’t. The other special thing about yesterday is that is was SUNNY! Yes, the sun actually came out and stayed out for many consecutive hours. I was pleased to have the opportunity to dry out, warm up, feel the sun on my neck.
You have great handwriting for your age
Music from John Martin & Gary Watson
- Take him/her for a walk in the morning and at night?
- I had a photography sessions with the Corbitt family. Katie, is one of my oldest friends, I think we've known each other since kindergarten! Crazy! It was so fun to meet her cute kiddos! To see more from the session check out my photog site.
Someone (Watson) has apparently seen a phenomenon like this – Astronomica, p. 145. Two black holes collide and create gamma ray bursts.
Bile will need out. I just came across, not published, a most delicious piece I wrote a couple of days ago – on dirt. Dishing it. So glad I omitted publishing it.
faded valentine...
One of my goals in 2009 is to try at least 1 new recipe a week. I have so many wonderful, healthy, low fat/low-cal cookbooks, and I’m looking forward to trying out a bunch of new meals.
Or bring him cake as payment.
Berries: If Hollywood still made horror films based around foods, The Attack of the Killer Sweet Tooth could easily be the name of a new thriller. Instead of allowing yourself to succumb to the temptation of a cookie, pop some blackberries or strawberries into your mouth. Frozen blueberries also provide the illusion of enjoying a cold, high-calorie treat (step away from the Häagen-Dazs!).
Every detail that Holman includes is in and of itself interesting. But at the end of the novel, I'm left scratching my head figuring out what went wrong. The same thing happened to me at the end of Mammoth Cheese - I didn't care about the main character enough to feel emotionally involved when Bad Things Happen.
holding yellow flames out like spring daystars
The fall proves to be a hard season for Tyson and we are learning how to help him the best way that we can. I believe it is an anniversary of the relinquishment and there is still much to process in his feelings. He has come so far and is doing really well, but healing hurts for all those involved.
For the novel, I didn’t feel the “spark” I feel when reading a book. The story was okay, but I didn’t exactly love it, but I also don’t hate it. The characters were easily forgettable. I’m just disappointed because the story had so much potential. Lacks action and movement. I will probably read the next book if I’m given, but I’m not really anticipating it. Good story though.
“Some pieces are great enough to be mightily impressive and some seemingly so shallow I wince. Sometimes I see Rashid as the pithy, perceptive commentator (a la Chris Rock) on what it means to grow up black. Sometimes I see him as an opportunist calculating what he can get away with without having to put in real substance. (It is unfortunate that in our society any artist of color must make a decision about playing the race card. Race is an issue in America and even if an African-American artist avoids the issue - by so-doing, he or she is still addressing it.) So, where would Rashid’s work be without race? Why do white people buy a jersey inscribed “White people like me?” If white people are going to fall all over themselves to show how tolerant and accepting they are, we have to expect black artists to play into that. Rashid Johnson is talented. He certainly is affable. Unfortunately I see him playing in the shallow end of the pool of issues about race in America, jumping up and down, yelling “look at me – look at me. Throw money at me and you’ll feel better about yourself.” Well, it’s working, and that’s too bad. It’s time we grow up. I’m eager to see what Rashid will do when he tires of this successful game of white people liking him.” (sorry to quote at such length)
“This guy had clearly seen too many movies in which menacing Gestapo agents demanded to see a terrified refugee’s papers” – p. 147 (MO’s “Pick 3 Midday,” 10/23).
I think women want to look younger, and men want to act younger. While waiting for the salesman to prep the bike I bought, two strikingly beautiful young women came into the store. Is there anything more educational about aging than envying the young?
I called the Metro office first thing in the morning, and to my relief, someone had turned in my license plate and documents. An hour later, I attended a weekly meeting where nearly everyone was wearing a tie in honor of Tie-Tuesday, a totally random fad of which I am the only female advocate for at work. Sweet!
Hopefully I'll have a meeting which will sort out a decent webpage for the event and will be able to bounce ideas of someone else.
Both girls look like stars, no braces! Sakes alive!
I am so excited! Weight Watchers asked me to be an insider! They have extended my online membership, sent me an ipad to try out their amazing Kitchen Companion application (review and video to come soon), and many other exciting perks and things to share with you, my readers.
"Having a nood gight?" I ask in an attempt to be coy. Unfortunately the slurring might give me away
I’m positive no one remembered that last night as she moved exceptionally well in the ring, particularly after coming off of a yearlong absence due to a knee injury.
First, to do this, you need to be prepared... it is not going to be stuff you have on hand. You are going to have to go to the store and get the supplies.
If you want to make the same margarita but you don’t want it to be blue, simply substitute triple sec for the Blue Curacao.
During Today’s Scottish Television lunchtime news Political Editor Bernard Ponsonby reported that Strathclyde police were to investigate allegations of phone hacking in Scotland. He concluded his piece (which can be seen Here ) by stating that that the “finger of suspicion” was pointing to Douglas Wight, a News of the World journalist and Crown witness during the Sheridan trial.
The earliest of these reports that I've been able to find - at least in the 19th century British Library Newspapers selection presented online by Gale - is an undated article from Aris's Birmingham Gazette reprinted in The Derby Mercury on 7 May 1862. While primarily a promotion for his "admirable chronological charts," it states that Mr Foster will complete his 100th year in a few months" and refers to his military service, but strangely makes no mention whatsoever of his artisitic career. One very definitely gets the impression, on reading it, that Foster provided the information to the Gazette reporter himself. Likewise, much of the biographic material used by Henry Adams in his speech is likely to have been put forward by Foster who, as I demonstrated in Part 1, was particularly adept at self promotion using a variety of media.
A God who loves all of us, even my father.
Yet another woman I’ve never heard of, Annie Churchill, is reported to be divorcing her husband after he plead guilty to defrauding investors. I couldn’t care less, but I was struck by the what the former “love of her life” was doing with the stolen money: buying food and clothing for himself and her (so why wasn’t she arrested too?) but failing to pay the rent.
It was a beautiful environment conducive to quiet and spiritual inspiration from the moment I drove past the main entrance and all through the winding walkways that led me to the shrine of Our Lady’s Grotto. A life-size marble replica of Michelangelo’s Pieta is featured in the center of a rock cave carved into the base of a 110-foot cliff.
I'll also make post when I do actually buy the items.
One of the things that took me years to learn is that while we are waiting on God to reveal his will for us, we should be doing the things we already know pleases Him. God’s word tells us what His will is for every Christian believer. What does the Scriptures say we must do? Abstain from those habits that are bad and sinful, such as smoking, drugs, nightclubs, rock music, skin magazines, gambling, etc. To stay away from everything that has the appearance of evil. (1 Thessalonians 5:22) Jesus said if you love me you will obey me.
Yreka, California 96097 USA
By all accounts London has really got it going on at the moment. But I wasn't there in 2011 so can't comment. My award goes to Prague for its ale revolution sitting atop a well-deserved reputation for kick-ass lagers. Well worth a weekend if you're anywhere in the vicinity.
‘Son of Man’ is one of the titles of the Messiah which comes from Daniel 7:13-14. Jesus used this title often to assert his divinity.
they speak to me!
Assembly: Lay out half your cookies and pipe a generous amount of filling onto the center. Top them with the other half of your cookies, pressing down gently to push the filling to the outer edges of the cookie. Makes about 15 whoopie pies.
We are SO stoked to know that there are people out there reading our babble about crocheting this and spray painting that, mod podge here and fabric there. And commenting, too. We LOVE comments (like all bloggers do)!
It was really impressive to visit a brewpub that did not have a bad beer on tap. Not all of the beers were earth shattering but more than half of their lineup was stellar. Great to have this in TX, but I wish it was in Austin.
D and I have been having a lot of car problems lately. And when I say a lot, I mean A LOT. Since my last car issues post, there have been some serious (and expensive) brake issues on D's car, and some new tires plus an alignment issue on my car. So when D called me the other day to let me know his power steering had mysteriously gone out...it about sent me over the edge. We took it to a shop to get it diagnosed and they told us how much it would cost to fix it. It was...um...too much. So we drove the car home (sans power steering) to do some thinking.
We all love playing with Leia but it’s not easy to run around after her constantly! So we considered teaching her to bring the ball back to us.
Now, perhaps the UAE can win a psychological war against Iran with the help of numerous Arab and Western media outlets who are ready to blast and blitz Iran on every occasion, but the fact on ground is that Abu Musa and the two other Persian Gulf islands will remain an eternal and indissoluble part of the Islamic Republic of Iran’s soil.
-A rising part-time labor force
o Presbyterian Hospital Matthews
153. “You can adopt the attitude there is nothing you can do, or you can see the challenge as your call to action.” – Catherine Pulsifer
3. Your entry should be made after the challenge has been posted. We won't say no to older projects but we prefer to see your new creations!
Miranda is currently writing her third novel, It Started With a Kiss (published 10th November this year) and is vlogging all year about the writing and publishing process of this novel on her blog.
But long-time critics of the President such as Breitbart have pointed out the similarities to Mao Zedong’s Great Leap Forward campaign of forced collectivisation and industrialisation – which resulted in the deaths of millions.
WHAT WOULD THE WALLS OF OUR HOME SAY?
東京ディズニーシーは楽しかったですよ。良かったと感じた点は、小さい子供連れの家族にとって、室内になっているリトルマーメイドのラグーンエリアがとても快適だという点です。私の3歳の娘は暑さに弱いので、彼女を連れてアリエルのラグーンエリアで沢山時間を過ごしました。リトルマーメイドの乗り物は、3歳の娘にはぴったりだったようで、とても楽しんでいましたし、遊び場もあり喜んでいました。6歳の長女にはちょっと物足りなかったようで、彼女は既に身長制限（117cm）のある乗り物も乗れるので、選択肢も多く、スリリングな乗り物も楽しんできました。
6. Dice the rest of the tomatoes. Add the vegetable mix, the macaroni and the rest of the tomatoes to the bean pot. Then add about 1½ cups of the bean liquid you set aside, as well as the juice from the tomatoes. Mix gently, add extra seasoning to taste, bring to the boil, reduce the heat to low, cover and simmer for another 10-15 minutes. Note: Save the remaining bean liquid for use in heating up any leftovers.
Shouted an amazed Moon.
He was just leaving the house to drive his girlfriend - who is delightful - to the station, when he heard a noise like a Eurofighter cranking up for take-off at Saba. Looking up, he noticed that a turbojet on full afterburner appeared to have become embedded in the top of the chimney, casting an eerie glow into the night sky. Unlocking the house he entered the kitchen. Unopened mail, snackpots, decorative garlic plaits and smaller items of furniture were being sucked across the room into the stove door, which now resembled the mouth of a volcano on curry night. The cat had its front legs wrapped round the marble sculpture of two penguins that his mum did on a residential week in Tuscany. He quickly phoned the Fire Brigade, while his delightful girlfriend sat down with her laptop and began some coursework.
6. No matter how much you push the envelope, it'll still be stationery.
Alchemy is a word that keeps popping up recently for me and I’m seeing that this truly is a time for some magickal and creative alchemy. I always see a pattern with recurring themes that cycle around. This is definitely a time for empowered living and becoming masterful at transmutation, more than ever, and that means “taking back our power” along with responsible compassion, wise discernment, aligning/surrounding yourself with the highest-vibe, resonating elements in and around you, and activating a little creative alchemy by learning how to shift and integrate things so we can turn what we have into “gold.”
Tyndall had his best season yet in 2010-11. The Eagles set a Morehead State record for wins, finishing 25-10. They also won their second OVC Championship under Tyndall and advanced to the NCAA Tournament for the second time, defeating Louisville in the second round. For his efforts, Tyndall was recognized as the National Association of Basketball Coaches (NABC) District Coach of the Year.
Good luck to all of my fellow students finishing up this spring semester, and a hearty congratulations to my fellow graduates. I wish you all many good books and sleepy rainy days and sunny sandy beach days and other exciting things.
Sausages?
No, mamma, it’s not a house, it’s a bank!
This is where the yoga magic happened. As soon as I walked into the hot room, I felt better than I had all day. I think the girls at the studio should offer a time slot where people can just come in and hang out in the hot room.
B Hugh Cornwell
Elemental: Sylphs (invisible beings)
Something compelled David to be honest. Perhaps all the voodoo dolls staring at him? "I don't know how I feel anymore."
Just like Caio i complain about the colours, because for real the blue is very bright, her hair and body has lots of colors, more than you can see on the screen. And i welcome all my new blogfriends......
On the second day, God created the monkey and said, "Entertain people, do tricks, and make them laugh. For this, I'll give you a twenty-year life span."
More about Steve Lichtman
government and we are continuing — are willing to have the
For the past two years, Mackenzie and I have gotten our hair CHOPPED off. It is just too hot to have it long. Mackenzie has been begging us to cut her hair really short. We told her that we wanted her to wait until at least after her dance recital. We waited a little longer before letting her get her hair cut but it was worth the wait. She looks so cute and she loves to shake her hair and look at herself in the mirror. A friend from middle school cuts hair and I caught back up with her on Facebook when I was still on there. Her shop is in Arkansas and she occasionally comes to Memphis to cut hair. It is just too hard to take Brady so she agreed to come to the house to cut our hair.
If my parting has left a void
TCI: How’s that coming along?
“Nicole Lazzaro ups the game with game that actually can make a difference. Noble cause gaming = early indicator of most positive trend.”
Without another word I rushed out of the bar. I opened the door and was hit by a burst of freezing air and whirling snowflakes. I stumbled down the snowy street in a daze and tears streaming down my face. Michael Simmons was my father.
One of the other things it is frustrating not to know is how Alicia met Archibald. Had she gone to China – she is described in the ODNB as having travelled widely – or did they meet in England when Archibald was on home leave? Either way, they married on 2 November 1886, when Archibald was 48 and Alicia 41, and seemed to have been blissfully happy thereafter. They settled in the far west of China, at Chungking (Chongqing), ‘1500 miles from the sea, 500 miles beyond the reach of steamers’, as Alicia wrote in My Diary in a Chinese Farm (1898).
If you have a preference where you want your public key and private key completely separate in their own files, you can use the terminal to export the keys by hand.
Sebastian Gorki, 27, New York, N.Y.
The internet – Twitter especially – has allowed me to connect with so many people in this industry, people I would never have had the chance to meet otherwise: agents, editors, writers, readers, bloggers, critique partners. Some of these people have become my dearest friends. For that, I am truly grateful.
Personally, I don’t give a damn about the song or the critical responses. This blog (and its writer) could care less about the technicalities. But the song has been deemed ‘catchy’ and I’d say yes to that. Linguists say that the song’s lyrics can be placed under Cosmic Irony or what they call ‘Irony of Fate’. And this is what this entry is about.
We talked a bit more about life in general, enjoyed some fresh-squeezed orange juice and soon it was time to leave. My impression of the 1/2 day I spent with Juan and his family—WOW!
feedback of our consultant family.
Although many believe that the visitation during a dream is nothing more than the need to see the person again so badly that the mind manufactures the visit, there are some visitations that are not so easily explained. Visitations have been reported when the person was not sleeping. They may sense a presence around them and turn around to see their son, daughter or husband who has recently passed.
“Are you hungry?” Scratching his head, Bob looked at both of them, a little nervous because of the way Emily was looking at him. “Your grandma’s making some pancakes do you want some?” Bob looked over at Tara, who sent him a small smile as she watched him interact with the children. Emily and Reese still stared at him, not moving from where they were standing. “Come on, sit down at the table.” Taking out a chair from the table, Bob pushed both of them forward, making Emily sit down first and then picking up Reese and putting him in the chair next to her. “Are you thirsty? What do you drink with your breakfast?”
Yep, that's right...I will be leaving this old blogspot behind! I'm moving to a new place in the very near future.
been here a little over a week. :)
needed comfort. I wanted the feeling to be more relaxed and not so cluttered.
Don't get me wrong, I'm not all about the melting pot idea, where everybody in America tosses aside their races and ethnicities and becomes simply American, 24/7. I'm simply pushing for more interelation. More communication, and less pretending the racist elephant bomb ticking away in the center of the room isn't there.
1. Is it accurate? I think most people would agree this belief is inaccurate and too pessimistic. The best way for Paul to find out would be to test alternative beliefs and note the results. The problem with this belief is that Paul would rarely ever test it, so he’ll gather little or no evidence either way. Perhaps he formed this belief by overgeneralizing after a bad experience. On those rare occasions when he does push himself socially, his belief will negatively affect his communication style, thus encouraging the rejection he expects.
Down Lighter Range – Endura Down Lighter is available in three ranges – SQ Swivel, RD Swivel, and DL 16W. SQ swivel and RD swivel lights are available in 4*3W with round and square shape. This range comes with a wide operating voltage. Its unique design of heat sink is more effective for air dissipation. The range is available in sleek and elegant design in cool and warm colors. Price range Rs. 6600/-.
and clearing out the area around it that i'd come to refer to as "the dump". really, it had old paint cans piled up, a toilet, a keg from the previous tenants, leftover construction materials, landscaping stones... all covered in a very thick layer of morning glories. so at least our junk looked a little pretty.
So I'm taking a step back from blogging.
Pink Ruffles - ballerina pink - taken from the ruffles - 251.206.204
Does it look like you imagined?
“A Humble Man of A Passing Night” – A Poem on Indifference
Osceola County Sheriff’s deputies arrested two suspects for their involvement in a burglary at Central Florida Power Equipment located on Partin Settlement Road in Kissimmee.
“Not only are traditional SPIAs and newer DIAs illiquid as to cash surrender values or commuted values,” he writes in, “Oh No! DIAs & SPIAs in Marital Property Estates,” a white paper released in December, “but the annuitants and contract features such as COLAs (cost of living adjustments) and rights of survivorship, period certain durations, payment amounts and dates can’t be altered after the contract issue date.”
Anonymous, confidential HIV/AIDS information in English and Spanish. Referrals to appropriate services, including clinics, hospitals, local hotlines, counseling and testing sites, legal services, health departments, support groups, educational organizations, and service agencies throughout the United States.
Here’s how it goes:
Continue to relax & smile and after a few minutes of following your feeling without any effort you can feel the peace and calmness in your chest and you may feel how your chest expands. This is the feeling from the heart.
Combine flour, yeast, sugar and salt in a mixing bowl.
"Are you selling this ?" I said to the man next to it .
Although it made front-page headlines in the UK and America, two impending by-elections overshadowed coverage of The Beatles’ demise in Ireland.
I ask whether they know what it will be, and one of the ladies kindly tells me it will be Akahoshigomadara. Ooh! I know that one! The Red Ring Skirt that I saw last fall while out walking. I thank them and tell them I'm impressed with their ability to notice that one of those leaves was not a leaf...
Sadly, I didn't have a Plan B and my Damascene moment never came. Some booksellers passed through the shop like gap year backpackers in Goa, taking a breather before going on to enjoy successful careers in television or publishing. I stayed and became Colonel Kurtz.
Thank You Thank You Thank You
The Household Charge is an interim measure only and a comprehensive and equitable valuation-based property tax will be introduced in the next two years.The Household Charge is €100 per residential property this year but it is thought it will rise in years to come.The new charges will be payable as a one off payment online or by post or by quarterly direct debits.This Household Tax will have to be paid before March 31st in each year of liability to avoid penalty charges.All Owners of residential property in Ireland will be liable for the charge on each residential property they own as at 1st January 2012.No bills or invoices for this household charge will be sent,the charge will be on a self declaration basis.The definition of a residential property includes – house, maisonette, flat, apartment or bedsit. So the owner of a building split into 5 bedsits will be liable for five lots of Household Charge.A building is liable if it is occupied, or suitable for occupation. An empty house will not be exempt.Registration and payment can be carried out online on the HouseholdCharge.ie website. Payment by Mastercard, Visa or Laser accepted. There will also be an option to fill in a paper registration form and pay by post or in person at your local Council Office before March 31st.Forms should also be available to download or collect from Council Offices.Late payment penalties apply as follows:Payments made within 3 and 6 months of January 2012, a 10% penalty.Payments made between 6 and 12 months late, a 20% penalty.Payments more than 12 months late, a 30% penalty plus 1% interest per month.So if someone is 12 months late paying the €100 household charge, they will owe €130 plus another €12 interest – a total of €142.If charges remain unpaid a charge will remain attached to the property.The Household Charge is expected to raise about €160 million a year,but there will be costs incurred in administration and collection of the charge.
If my heart could send me a message what would she say to me?
Confession: Recently, I cannot get enough barbecue. It's just so darn good. Lucky for me, I live in Oklahoma and there is shortage of yummy barbecue places for my craving.
Chinese foreign ministry spokeswoman Jiang Yu said,
The story is about Tate and her adventures outside of the Estilorian plane. Inside the plane she is protected from most dangers, but Tate was never one to sit by and watch her life go by. When one of her cousins gets the chance to try and bring forth her wings Tate follows her and that is when the trouble starts. You see there are murders outside of the plane and a conspiracy that brings an ancient artifact into play that may or may not exist. Tate gets thrown into this and she gets to truly show what she is capable off. Throw in a great mix of characters and you have yourself a wonderful and exciting high fantasy novel.
Working with one piece of dough at a time roll out to about 6 inches, put 1/6 of meat mixture on one side of dough about 1/4 cup of mozzarella and a sprinkle of parmesan. Wet the edges of the dough slightly, fold over one side and crimp edges to seal. Place on a greased or lined pan or a baking stone. Repeat with the remainder of the dough & filling. Let Calzones rest for about 10 minutes, brush tops and edges with beaten egg. Put three small slashes in each to allow steam to escape. Bake for 15-20 minutes or until nicely golden brown. Serve with a nice salad and you have a meal.
Scrivener also wrote The Authorized Version of the English Bible (1611): Its Subsequent Reprints and Modern Representatives (first published in 1884, reissued in 1910), drawing on his knowledge of the history and reception of the AV. (It is interesting to note that ‘Authorised’ and ‘Authorized’ are both used by the same scholars in different publications. In my copy-editing days, I was taught to use the ‘z’ in this one context, even if the rest of the book used ‘s’ . . .)
As a promise, instructions were given for future celebrations—a week of repentance and abstention from leaven, which symbolized sin. The feast was established as a memorial. Answers were given for the children’s questions: “What does this mean?” “By a strong hand the LORD brought us out of Egypt, from the house of slavery” (Exodus 13:14). Imagine being a child during the first Passover. There would be questions! You’d never forget the terror of the night. Would God keep his promise and spare those under the blood?
Today I wanted to share a little Easter basket with you. I created it using an amazing Silhouette file by Lori Whitlock called Woven Basket. Lori has done it again---when I saw this basket in her store...I IMMEDIATELY had to have it.
And then, I started asking myself: would I recognise Godot if he hit me in the face?
So, what's our biggest issue?
Artist and author, Jackie Battenfield, has written a useful and well-organized guide to helping artists make a living doing what they love. Using step-by-step exercises, each chapter begins with a necessary stage in building a foundation for an art career then offers steps to put the ideas into practice.
Our first destination in the United States was Disneyland in LA! We were so excited, even my parents were jumping up and down in the line not believing they were actually there. I always remember mum telling me that going to Disneyland was like revisiting her childhood and memories of watching Disney shows as a family. Of course we had the most wonderful time at Disneyland; it was as if you walked into a fantasy world. A few years later I was in Europe and I couldn’t resist going to Disneyland Paris where I experienced the wonder of it all again.
Eric Finch has worked in politics in both Westminster and Brussels for many years, becoming steadily more disenchanted with both government and the media. He is 46 and divorced with 5 children, and always bears in mind the wise words of the Manic Street Preachers: "If you tolerate this, your children will be next". Follow him on Twitter @ccurmailtoTMay.
I would be home on this rock in the sun rays,
This is what my bedroom looks like when I'm in the middle of a collage:
GSM Switching System:
I know. All of you folks out there who have Sonlight or A Beka Curriculum guides to rely upon are probably hyperventilating right about now. Believe me, I have considered what the blessing of knowing what is going to be done on any given day (and not needing to plan anything myself) might be. But any time I try it, it's a big flop.
But it's not Immigrants, the 1%, Chinese, the UN, goddamn eviloutionists or whatever who are destroying America. It's the US political culture. The bureaucracy is rampant. Companies are fleeing the US. Capital markets round the world are closing to US capital, because of the sheer arrogance of the US tax authorities which make it just too much trouble to have an American as a client. And going to America, with the TSA who verge between dangerously paranoid and actually insane, is becoming unpleasant if not down-right dangerous. The DEA has destabilised an entire continent, South America; and the War on Terror is in danger of doing the same to Central Asia. The USA has been betraying its history and ethos with rendition, torture and support for less-than savoury regimes. America has been resting on its laurels for some time, and will lose allies fast when it's no longer the biggest boy on the block if it continues in this vein.
Funny how the owner can always be traced when no damage has been done ! Odd, isn’t it? And if ‘horses’ and ‘Yorkshire Police’ is ringing bells with you, then congratzs! There may well be a solution here! It’s certainly occurred to others…
As a result of this expansion, this verdict contributes to that “chilling” effect on free speech that the ACLU selectively complains about. People who disagree about the legitimacy of same-sex marriage, for example, or resist the attempt to normalize homosexuality, now face the possibility that their opinions, if expressed in ways subjectively interpreted as “hurtful,” could be construed as “bias intimidation” or a “hate crime” or “bullying,” and hence subject to legal sanctions. After all, if normal freshman boorishness can be criminalized, anything can. Already the threat of such prosecution lurks behind every charge of “sexism” or “racism” or “homophobia.” We saw this tactic in the recent uproar over Rush Limbaugh’s comments about Sandra Fluke, which a Washington Post blogger called “hate speech” that “crossed into the realm of sexual harassment.” That is, as something that the power of the government can punish. Such threats can lead to self-censorship and an environment that is hostile to free speech.
Chicken is used as one of the main ingredients. The Chinese believe that chicken is nutritious and have healing properties when cooked for a long time. In this vegetarian dish, I replace the chicken with turnips which help to make the soup sweet. Below are the list of Chinese herbs I used and also the health benefits of each and everyone of it.
So abide, so love
So where there is no peace, we can pray and ask God to create peace for us. We can pray Scriptures back to God, and His Word which is living and active, can transform our minds and hearts, and if He so desires--our circumstances, although He may decide to mold and shape me so that I can withstand my circumstances. Either way, I win! Fear takes a backseat to God's Word spoken in faith!
However, a University of Miami study shows that “tannins are increasingly recognized as dietary carcinogens and as antinutrients interfering with the system’s full use of protein” and called for more studies correlating early death and regular kola nut use in third world countries. Kola nut should not be used for long periods of time.
Laura tucked her feet up under herself and hugged her legs to her chest. Would this argument ever be resolved? Would she ever forgive Hayley for taking her child? Moreover, would Hayley ever forgive herself for giving up what she now wanted so much?
After being discharged in March this year, Ms Parma was moved to a nursing home in Barking and Dagenham.
Flossmoor Station IPA
Here's the original picture:
Another potential effect of the new rule may be to affect judicial decisions on whether to transfer a case to another district or not. We’ve previously written about how multi–defendant cases have at times received different treatment from single–defendant cases. Courts have at times concluded that no forum is really more convenient than any other if the case involves defendants located throughout the United States—a location that is convenient to a California company is inconvenient to a New York business. In single–plaintiff, single–defendant cases, however, the transfer question is a simple choice between two competitors—the jurisdiction the plaintiff chose and the one the defendant prefers. In patent cases, where the majority of the evidence relates to the defendant’s allegedly infringing activities, a defendant may have an easier time demonstrating that the case really would be more conveniently litigated in the forum in which it allegedly engaged in those activities.
Why suddenly blogging so many food during this month?
We give thanks to God always for you all, making mention of you in our prayers; Remembering without ceasing your work of faith, and labour of love, and patience of hope in our Lord Jesus Christ, in the sight of God and our Father; Knowing, brethren beloved, your election of God. For our gospel came not unto you in word only, but also in power, and in the Holy Ghost, and in much assurance; as ye know what manner of men we were among you for your sake. And ye became followers of us, and of the Lord, having received the word in much affliction, with joy of the Holy Ghost: So that ye were ensamples to all that believe in Macedonia and Achaia. For from you sounded out the word of the Lord not only in Macedonia and Achaia, but also in every place your faith to God-ward is spread abroad; so that we need not to speak any thing. For they themselves shew of us what manner of entering in we had unto you, and how ye turned to God from idols to serve the living and true God; And to wait for his Son from heaven, whom he raised from the dead, even Jesus, which delivered us from the wrath to come.
Let's return to Watergate. When the activities of the Nixon Whitehouse "Plumbers" became known, a vigorous media examination provided the water and bleach to quickly disinfect the mess and restore the integrity of government institutions. Officials as high as the U.S. Attorney General went to prison, and President Nixon was forced from office in abject disgrace.
At the 'meet the teacher' a few days later, Jack showed off his painting of his Pelican. This year he switched 'teams'. He went from being a 'shark' to being a 'pelican'.
In response to @Sibusisomtungwa, he tweeted: “You missed the gist of my msg… which is the only time a black man is afforded a dignified audience is when he pulls a gun.”
“anti-racism” is really code for anti-White: the race problem is White genocide.
And feel the power if you won’t
KERMADEC IS RAOUL IS.: 29.2S 177.9W; 19:12UTC 19 MAR
Have a go: 1-0 to Drogheda is 6/1 with Bwin. This was a scoreline when the sides played in an annual pre-season memorial match, also played at the same venue. I could see a repeat scoreline this time.
Dinner is ready
1 4 ounce can chopped green chiles
In recent times, the mind has to deal with the constant and continuous influx of rapidly changing and insurmountable amounts of information, evolving work and life dynamics, complexity of needs and wants and things you have to do to keep it all together while trying to meet all the challenges thrown your way.
Fastforward to 2010 – Nearly 15 years after Rangeela was released, RGV is now a sad butt of all jokes. From being an example of all things that a film-maker should do, he metamorphosed into an example of all things that a film-maker should not do!
Thinking about what to write for Thankful Thursday, I didn’t have an idea for a poem. It’s not that I’m not thankful for anything. On the contrary, I’ve been feeling very thankful for so many things lately.
BUT, I don't really mind feeling them again. To use some rama-lama-ding-dong language, I'm owning these emotions, and am allowing myself to feel them. Case in point: I had a really crappy day at the office on Wednesday, came home with what in our house we call a "black cloud" over my head and generally allowed myself to pout and sniffle for the rest of the evening. And the next day, I was better. I've cried more in the last 2 weeks than I have in the past 18 months, but, again, I'm OK with it. Life makes you cry sometimes, and I can deal with it.
Well done all of you, please all mail me brenda@ibas.co.uk with your postal addys so your prizes can be posted out to you.
Lampang had the highest reading, at 235.3 micrograms per cubic metre of air. Safe levels of PM10 particles are considered to be 120 micrograms per cubic metre or less.
Flower pin - made by me
My dream job is to be a sports broadcaster, but I would love to just be working around a pro sports team.
Sagebrush planting project for the Wyoming Game and Fish: 7,000 sagebrush seedlings installed in 94 different planting locations within a 50,000 acre wildfire area southeast of Worland, WY.
His dying breath has brought me life
Comme un secret d'amour
This year I look forward to more collaborative projects...they are in the works and I am excited to keep you in the loop through this blog .... I look so forward to growing new collaborations this year ....
Gaslit Nightmares - Edited by Hugh Lamb
I Don’t wanna go on with you like that
1. Lighting is all important. Avoid taking scenery pictures in the middle of the day, unless, of course, you wish to use the sun as your focal point, or for accent. Example:
Europe has also been building a navigation system, called Galileo, which has two satellites in orbit, launched in October last year. The next two are scheduled to follow later this year.
It is possible to learn much about God’s invitation and never respond to itpersonally. Even so, His invitation is clear and nonnegotiable. In the book of Matthew 11:28-30, Jesus makes a very generous offer that is hard to resist. However, many of us turn our backs and walk away.
All species of lysimachia are commonly used as an ornamental plant. They prefer shade, but all grow and multiply readily. Purple loosestrife is so successful, that in parts of the United States, it has been declared a danger to wetlands, as it tends to quickly dominate and force out other species of local flora.
To the rest of you--enjoy the read. This book is *awesome*!!
Patagonia's east coast is a dry place, not all that dissimilar to the Karoo, which is why the Argentine government, under General Julio A Roca, gave the Boers the land in 1902, thinking that the hard-working South African farmers could draw fruit from the earth. Argentina wanted to attract settlers to Patagonia and the Boers wanted a patch of land in the sun that they could call their own after the British had burned their farms in the Anglo-Boer War.
Their awful folds in the dark air: silent she stood as night;
We're enjoying a rare experience out here in Maryland--Spring! We generally slip and skid from an icy winter through a brief, week-long mild patch of weather and begin the long slog through a sweltering, humid summer. But not so this year. It's been lovely, chilly, wet, and extremely green. Even this Portuguese/British/ German/American lady is feeling a little Irish.
I mentioned last week on Twitter that I was toying with the idea of creating a calculator for turning word counts into estimated book pages for YA novels. Well, newsflash, I’m not a programmer, so there’s no cool Java calculator, but I can provide these two tricks. First, the crudest. 40,000 words in a relatively standard format (i.e. a mix of narrative paragraphs and dialogue without too many unusual things like court-room transcriptions*, etc.) will be just over 200 pages on a conventional 5 3/16 by 8” books page with normal margins. This is crude, like I said, but in the ballpark for sure.
People love to pit the two HULK movies against one another, too, and given that I spoke rather glowingly about the Ang Lee film, you might be expecting me to take a bunch of cheap shots at Louis Letterier’s film. Believe me, if the film was worthy of cheap shots, I’d have no problem dishing them out, but the truth is that I enjoy THE INCREDIBLE HULK every bit as much as Lee’s film, but for different reasons. Where Lee’s HULK is a movie about adult characters dealing with serious psychological issues of dysfunctional parent-child relationships, Letterier’s INCREDIBLE is a more classically-designed action film. The Hulk was almost an unwanted participant in HULK, but he’s the reason INCREDIBLE exists.
“That’s really funny. I better read about it in the blog,” she said.
Unlockable Movies
New Mexico currently recognizes concealed carry permits from or has reciprocal agreements with the following states: Arizona, Arkansas, Colorado, Delaware, Florida, Kansas, Louisiana, Michigan, Mississippi, Missouri, Nebraska, North Carolina, North Dakota, Ohio, Oklahoma, Tennessee, Texas, Virginia and West Virginia.
who is growing up so quickly.
“PS what did you think of the Royal Wedding? GLUED to that screen, I was! Now I don't know about Wills but you want to watch that Kate. Someone told me the other day she was a notorious prostitute in Tottenham North London and a real one for the crack pipe!”And I thought, reading this and casting my mind back not an hour or more: I can see that.
Given the option of taking additional coursework or being assigned to other classes, I headed back to the university. To obtain the certification I sought, I had to earn an English minor, which required - unsurprisingly - that terrifying Shakespeare course.
VET LADY: Name?
The other day, one of the comments asked about my journal pages themselves and how come they have the little tabs on them. It's because they're file folders. I like the thickness of file-folder paper and recently when I was in target they had them on sale--100 for 5$. I cut them up to make my pages. The parts that are left over are being used in other projects. Here is a photo of my journal:
Skype is social.
I hope you're all doing well and making your dreams come true out there! Because if you're not, you better go look in the mirror and see what's holding you back!
First off, I have started a list of things I need to organize. I’m sure it will grow even more as I realize how unorganized my house it! I printed off the ’52 weeks of Organizing’ list that Laura from Organization Junkie.
I bought my first Bible today (4-10-2012). After much thought, I have decided that the only way to form my own understanding of Christianity is through my eyes. In the previous posts, I shared with you all the ways I collided with the concept of God. In all honesty, I was hesitant to share my posts because I did not want to illicit any feelings of negativity from readers. Through much introspective contemplation, I realized I took the words of others as the truth which in reality is not necessarily true. Call it my learned scientific instinct…I’m prone to finding reliable sources before I assume that something is fact. So, I decided today to explore this further by reading the Bible and Saint Augustine’s “On Free Will”. I am also starting to read selected Sutta Pitaka discourses from the Pali Canon, the standard scriptures in Buddhism. The final text I am reading is the Tao Te Ching by Lao Tzu. The Tao Te Ching is only 80 chapters long which consists of mostly a three stanza (3-5 lines) per a chapter of poetry.
Recently, on Twitter, I’ve been following Kat Von D ( @katvond ). I have to admit to having a bit of a crush on her. She is amazing. The heroine in my book Stained is slightly based on her. I tried to put a bit of wild child in Thorn the heroine. She has long onyx hair and rides a Ducati. She’s a natural born witch who is a tattoo artist with her own shop called Stained.
The speech went on, but let’s stop there and focus on one aspect of the above quote.
Kellie's presentation might not have been up there with the best, but wait until one of those balls hits your tastebuds, bud.
he and his goddamn four year old daughter knew absolutely nothing. i was suffering. i had been suffering. my headaches were unexplainable, unless you believed in gremlins that sat perched on various curves and lobes of my brain and took turns shoving their fingernails inside. there was just bullshit pouring from different holes. if only he could have seen it. him. i owed that asshole nothing, and at the same time felt compelled to do whatever i had to do in life to help make him understand.
Hardly aware of her departed lover; 250
Additionally, I got to try different ways of coloring my pieces. This time, I learned to use stain! (rather than glaze.) I like the look it gives the bowl. A lot more textured and rustic. Almost like the bowl is actually old and valuable (HA! valuable. funny.) Now maybe I should fill it up with something and put it to good use…
The Obama administration, despite the nation’s economic woes, effectively killed the job-producing Keystone Pipeline last month. The Arab Spring is turning the oil production of Libya and other Arab nations over to the Muslim Brotherhood. Iraq is distancing itself from the U.S. And everyone recognizes that Iran, whose crude supplies are critical to the European economy, will do anything it can to frustrate America’s strategic interests. In the face of all of this, Obama insists on cutting back U.S. oil potential with outrageous restrictions.
So at around 8:15 this evening I received a call from a peculiar number on my iPhone that I had never seen before. I answered only to my surprise to be greeted by a call from the Melbourne JET Program co-ordinator offering me nothing more than everything i have always dreamed of.
If God came down to earth right now and showed himself to everyone I wouldn’t be surprised if more people than not would go the rest of their lives believing they are crazy rather than to believe in God.
The Chinese government is pursuing an extensive strategy to close down Protestant house churches throughout the country, a Christian human rights organization has reported. According to China Aid Association, a group “committed to promoting religious freedom and the rule of law in China” its website explains, in 2010 the Chinese government launched a three-phase campaign to stamp out “illegal” churches, and to move all Protestant congregations under the umbrella of the government approved system known as the Three-Self Patriotic Movement.
PIZZA:
not just decorated my glasses box but i have made my Tilda Doll to compliment with it ..
Did I cheat?
See it iced and trimmed with roses!
10/16 (Sun) 12:00-20:00
Shame on successive governments that competed all on the joint themes of security and the "immigrant problem", so that it wouldn't become too visible that they served primarily the interests of the economic oligarchy! Shame on the intellectuals of neo-racialism and thick nationalism, who patiently covered the void left in the people by the temporary eclipse of the communist hypothesis with a coat of nonsense about the Islamic danger and the destruction of our "values"
How to record the peace and comfort pulled through the pain of my latest illness, the opportunity for stillness because I couldn't rush my physically ill body, the joy of a praise song that took my mind from the meaningless and moved it to meditation?
the best meal of the day....
I doubt if there will be much left; they'll soon put it away,
Tomorrow is another day, and we shall see where it leads us. We’re back to trying to nail down 2 good naps and then we’ll worry about the binky and trying to get rid of that thing. It’s a never-ending process and just when you think you’ve got it, these kids go and change it up on you. The nerve!
Zombie Tag is a novel that will touch everyone who reads it differently. In my opinion it is genre breaking and makes room for an entire line of edgier middle-grade novels, not to mention more paranormal middle-grade novels.
Sometimes that's a good thing, but there is the odd person - by that I mean a parent - who's behavior is less that ideal. My own childhood was good - very good compared to some folks' and that's down to my folks doing the best they could. Yet I know of now-grown-up kids whose behaviour mimics the negative cycle of their own parents. Don't take this as a smug-as-sh** post, I think it's more a pondering over why they're doing what they're doing and how much sway do you have over your genetic programming/fate?
Call it impressive. Call it disgusting. But any way you slice it, it was funny.
For the kids. Not for me.
The signs are, at this stage, looking promising, as the chick has been feeding very well, with both Mr and Mrs P have been making regular appearances with food. We will monitor its progress closely, and we know that you will too.
If that visual wasn't enough to convince you should be eating things with truffle oil, try this video on for size. I'd do this if it meant I'd get truffle oil at every meal:
The RGB has scheduled two upcoming public hearings during which the public will be able to testify and weigh in on the adopted and proposed renewal lease guidelines. Details on the Brooklyn-based hearing is below—
- bulky
Yes, my father was soo tight on his wallet! Whew yes he was! Plus being raised in a strict Christian home had some perks and some real tear jerkers but overall I turned out ok – I guess!
The only problem is when life gets in the way! I was trying really hard to post at least once a week. Then there was WriteOnCon, a partial request, a trip to the pediatrician with the little guy, a weekend in the mountains and a visit from one of my oldest & dearest friends. Plus, my husband got called in for a couple weeks of work (Yay!! Freelance work sucks, btw), leaving me on 24/7 baby duty.
Instead of talking about how much weight I have lost, I think the most important barometer of success to share is my physical health milestones. Day 1, I could only swim 10 laps on 30 minutes and by day 14, I swam 16! WOOHOO! And, I made it 34 minutes on the treadmill at 3.5 at 3 incline and didn't die yesterday. LOL
Why torture your poor limbs?
The video that I shared above is a very interesting conversation between the regular Journey to Hope hosts and a chaplain that works in hospice care. In the course of the conversation with Cathy Chalmers, I was reminded of the power of presence. While in the midst of suffering, many search for questions. There is a tendency to want to provide easy answers. It is much more difficult, and I believe much more faithful, to allow someone to remain in the questions. To walk with someone in their trial is something I wrote one of my first blogs about. You can read it here.
the horse
I'm grateful for Supreme protein bars. We're not supposed to eat them that often, but man, they really come in handy in a pinch.
Well, family, I got to go again! Thanks for your emails and your love... I am suuuuper happy today, I just got an amazing package from my best friend!!! :) I still haven´t stopped smiling!
For Keith, it was important that he stay true to his values. That’s not always an easy decision to make, however, especially if you have family depending on you. Sometimes it’s much easier just to go with the flow, to convince yourself that you can work to change the company from the inside.
The purpose of this webpage (magazine) is to entertain, provide and inform the reader of the latest and rather significant news in music, fashion, entertainment, sports, politics and movements taking place in urban culture. Another purpose of this website is to host advertising spots on the webpage so that those with products or services related to some of the content on the webpage can reach an audience who they know would be interested in what they are offering. By visiting this webpage, the reader has the opportunity to
(Now I'm a little disturbed that he's okay with my dying as long as he can buy junk at the dollar store.)
If you don't like the sound of that, rest assured, there is another option. You can view your child as a partner, a member of your team in this game. You can have fun together, without competing at all, without needing to declare winners and losers. You can make up the rules as you go along, together with your child. You can listen when your child has a problem with the way you are setting up the game, and figure out how to keep it fun for both of you. You can tend to your child's needs and be supportive of his food choices and other preferences.
It’s been revealed that AKB48 13th generation research student Mitsumune Kaoru will be playing the lead role in the upcoming film, ‘Shoujo Camera‘.
With Regan out of the way, Willie Crawford took the number in 1969. He had worn 43 or 47 up until that point.
* Read a little/rest every afternoon
If you’re leaving, so if you’re leaving
line of stamps at Queen Kat Designs.
As I made the printed graphic paper cones for Zuzu’s birthday party in February, I thought how lovely a pillow covered in pale grey French script from an antique document would look. It would be a nice change on a plain winter white bed like mine, especially if it bore some sort of meaning. Every day by my “Roi” sends his gestures of fondness for me, his “Reine”, so this pillow has my name on it. Or does it? “La Principessa” Zuzu claims it!
For Valentine’s Day:
that’s found its
Broaden the Palette
Holidays are challenging enough and to add dealing with your addiction which can cause many undesired (and fatal)compromises. Trust me...finding solutions can be done! For someone who only had 61 days of sobriety at one time and am now going into my 3rd year of sobriety, this gal here is a living miracle that there is INDEED hope for those who question their sobriety.
Dark tea color with a robust head and a faint but noticeable maple smell. This one offers a good taste with “just enough” maple to make it a contender.
- Technology tools can lead to more integration or more isolation, depending on what we do with them–do we practice “passive consumption and broadcasting” or do we cultivate deeper personal interactions from our social networks?
on Facebook about how silly normal women look when they pose like supermodels, so I naturally had to try my best supermodel pose, flapper style, to match the hat! So, here is my tribute to high fashion psychedelic 3-year-old flapper models.
There was a lot of prep before going and now just unpacking, laundry and trying to catch up on sleep this week.
Lucky Delivery!
Then God planted an emotion of settlement in our hearts. We really felt like God was calling us to settle down whether that be here or somewhere else- hopefully there.
Bake for 5 minutes, then turn the beans and bake for another 5 minutes, until slightly browned. If you like your beans wilted, extend the cooking times to 10 minutes on each side.
Aliette de Bodard - The Lost Xuyan Bride ***: An alternate history where China colonized North America in the early 15th Century and allied with the Aztecs to keep the Spanish out. Nevertheless, the United States exists and Richard Nixon is President (well, she doesn't go that far, and she does make the US much poorer than in our timeline). Our Hero in this story is an American PI who's set up shop in Xuyan (Chinese North America), and is hired to find a runaway bride. The case leads him to uncover shocking connections between the the wealthy and organized crime, ya-dee-ya-dee-ya-da. Decent enough mystery, the idea of the alternate universe is interesting, but I think the world building could be improved. In particular, I have a problem with the idea that in a world that diverged so significantly would still have a World Wide Web that uses domain.tld/file.htm addressing.
But indigenous land struggle is a central fact of Mexican history, and in this fascinating new work Paul Liffman expands our understanding of it. Drawing on contemporary anthropological theory, he explains how Huichols assert their sovereign rights to collectively own the 1,500 square miles they inhabit and to practice rituals across the 35,000 square miles where their access is challenged.
Your money
The TUTORs are physical therapy solutions that are currently in use in leading U.S. and European hospitals and clinics and are fully certified by the FDA and CE. See WWW.MEDITOUCH.CO.IL for more information.
Version tried: Windows Free version
I supposed she might also have been thinking about other things - glamorous things and those not so much - like parties and hang overs, changes and the future, or about panics and desires, or hungers and loss. But in movies or in real life, I'm glad they left some things unsaid; so my imaginations can fill in the blanks. I stood there, crossing the threshold of wishing and hoping, admiring at the peak of thanking and believing.
After that, He told to his son abt his strange dream. In which, He was airing on air. The fast wind was carring him with itself. Then, he heard, the dont want businessman Moore while they want Dr Moore.
architecture, its internal capabilities, extension points, and support complex activities
Suede cloth is about $8 a yard at JoAnn Fabrics, but a 40% or 50% coupon would cut that considerably -- plus, you can get 3 diaper halves out of 2/3-3/4 yd (more if you make a contour diaper instead of a fitted).
La Terra Trema
It never ceases to amaze me how The Fishwrap inserts itself into Pottstown’s affairs. There is a fine line between reporting the news and “creating” the news.
So you might think this is boring, all that talk about the Russian Revolution and descriptions of lonely inmates and filthy bunkers. On the contrary, it’s entertaining. It’s not the regular type of prison where the inmates are always clamoring for food or for violence. Remember, the inmates in this prison are quite high-profile, so they have a little class.
Look, honestly, I cannot recommend this book highly enough. Seriously, why the hell are you even still reading my review and not beating booksellers to death with your cold hard cash… Oh yeah… release dates… my bad. PUT THIS BOOK ON HOLD AT YOUR LOCAL RETAILER GODAMMIT! I mean it. If you love fantasy, put down the George R.R. Martin, step away from the Tolkien (yes I went there, deal with it), and bury the Rowling. This is a book that will keep you engrossed until the end and then will leave you shaking your fist and prodding Hartman with a stick until she finishes the next one. Because if a YA author can make a fan out of me, then surely she can out of you.
The new tree form is now a cooldown
Remove dough from pan and allow to cool for at least 2 hours. The bread will snap, crackle, and pop while it is cooling!
Materials: Cotton knit outer, hidden layer of bamboo hemp fleece, cotton velour inner. Insets: cotton velour outer, bamboo hemp terry; heavy bamboo fleece.
Alai found it difficult to get his book Red Poppies published because it is about a sensitive period in history (the 1930s) and the death of a facet of Tibetan culture. He finished the book in 1994 and at the time publication proved difficult because it was thought to be unprofitable and also an issue with censorship. In 1998 opinions had changed and it was published and became a hot seller. He sold the English version for $150 000 in 1999.
It is only the definitional thought of black, the attempt to shine light on it, to see it as a thing, that paints black into privative relation to light. It is true that black is what is seen in the absence of light. But black is not that absence. Black is its own presence, not the presence of the absence of light. Black is the opposite of white, not of the light. That black appears in light’s absence, that it exists in the space of light’s negation, has nothing to do with opposition. Light itself is ‘black’, in the sense of having no color. Now we can understand the significance of the double negation openly buried in the expression: the black universe is not a negative light. The formulation beautifully highlights the problem of apogogic truth (absurdity of the absurdity, demonstration via double negation) and the question of tautology to which it is logically tied (double negation, contradiction, law of the excluded middle are forms of tautology, X=X). It addresses the question of double negation as already answered in color. Does black universe’s not being a negative light mean that black is a positive light? Obviously not. Does it mean that it is not a positive light. No. The statement opens black without determination as the space of something obscurely non-negative, a positive unlight, a negative non-dark, a color that is light itself before all shining, an accident that is the very substance of luminous void, even the unglimpsed light of what Eriugena calls “that invisible mystical
With no other orders and no response to their repeated attempts to raise radio contact with their command structure, the swamp rats invited the members of their platoon to return with them to the Okefenokee. A few individuals opted out, determined to try to reach their families instead. Those with family flung into the far corners of the U.S. decided it made more sense to stick together, try to figure out what had happened and ride it out with locals than to try to trek across the country on foot.
“Happy?” I screamed at Eros, standing up. At mortal school, I was number one in acting class. “You hit him!” I began fake sobbing. “You killed my boyfriend!”
Even within groups of the same race the line is "Wealth" ... "Upsacle... is the preferred word! then. I challenged her aas i would you to learn her rights and what can be done...
“Oh ho ho. So the little wayward, angry bastard wants another favour.” He lowers the cigarette, taps his fingers against the arm of my chair. Ashes fall to the equally ratty carpet covering the floor.
It made for some interesting adjustments in my playing. While I didn't feel any blister pain, I also didn't feel the strings at all. I spent more time looking at my fingers while playing than I have since I was first learning to play the harp. But I adjusted, and people enjoyed the show tunes and romantic songs I played.
1/3 cup low fat small curd cottage cheese
Grumbling, I got out of the car when I saw him open a nearby door, grabbing my bag of belongings from the passenger seat. Emily walked in with me.
First, a quick primer. The Golden Globe Award honors the best of television and film as judged by the 93 members of the Hollywood Press Association. Dating back to l944, the show tends to be a tad more glamorous than the Oscars (more celebrities from the big as well as small screens), more interesting (selections are broader as there are split categories for best actor and film based on comedy, drama, etc.), and the speeches more outrageous (translation - alcohol is served). Miss Golden Globe remains an annual staple as a coming out party of sorts for the daughter (and in some rare cases, sons) of a celebrity. Former Miss GG's include Melanie Griffith, Linda Evans, Joely Fisher, Rumer Willis with Donna Douglas (Beverly Hillbillies's Ellie Mae Clampett) as the show's first. Freddie Prinze, Jr. and John Clark Gable were two of the men who held the duties.
They also explain that consuming combinations of these drugs can significantly alter their adverse events and harm impacts. For example, magic mushrooms on their own have a very low incidence of adverse events, but individuals who consume mushrooms as well as alcohol have a much higher risk of accidents that result in death. Other examples of combinations mentioned include alcohol with cocaine, leading to cocaethylene - an extremely toxic compound, or alcohol with cannabis which can seriously affect an individual's ability to drive properly.
If the man masquerading as our chancellor really wanted to do something to kick-start the economy, he could dump the Climate Change Act. and all that goes with it. But he can't do that, any more than he can stop £1 billion being spent on this fatuous scheme.
This is about to change. I’ve now learned that but brushing alone misses the germs in 75% of a person’s mouth – I had no idea! It is essential to include mouthwash in everyone's dental hygiene regimen to keep our mouths protected.
Kwame Nkrumah was overthrown in a CIA-backed military coup in 1965 while he was on a state visit to China and North Vietnam. Nkrumah was a Marxist and a Pan-Africanist. A founder of the Organization of African Unity (OAU), Nkrumah was the recipient in 1963 of the Lenin Peace Prize, the Soviet Union’s version of the Nobel Peace Prize. When he was ousted by a CIA-backed military coup, all of the imperialist governments of the west were jubilant. So much for their embrace of democracy.
When he won the Pulitzer this year for criticism, the Boston Globe‘s Wesley Morris owed part of his victory to his writing about the Fast and Furious film series. Though the Fast movies are almost universally mocked as obnoxious pieces of shit, Morris calls them “incredibly important” for their depictions of race. “[U]nlike most movies that feature actors of different races, the mixing is neither superficial nor topical,” Morris wrote of Fast Five. “It has been increasingly thorough as the series goes on—and mostly unacknowledged. That this should seem so strange, so rare, merely underscores how far Hollywood has drifted from the rest of culture.”
China’s one-party governing system also induces distrust in various ways. Americans believe democratic political systems naturally understand each other better and that authoritarian political systems are inherently less stable and more prone to blaming others for their domestic discontent.
Murphy's Law states that when something bad can happen it will, so it began to rain.
“Yeah, good.” He replied not making eye contact with me.
mere mortals can not conceive.
This is while that British police has not yet taken any step to stop the EDL rival protest on August 21, despite the fact that the EDL fans have always been blamed for their violence and public disorders.
Bob – How can people contact you to discuss commercial real estate?
I woke up to a warm day. Eating breakfast made my mouth sweet. We cleaned the cabin and had a wonderful time reading our books. We had two classes. People took the swimming test at the pool. We ate lunch and had rest period. We played the championship game of European handball and then went back to the pool. We ate dinner and went to group discussion. We had Group activates and we watched Fantastic Mr. Fox.
Now, I will continue on this health course I am on. I think these naturals antibiotics and supplements and better eating has contributed greatly to what is happening. All things God uses. I like this biotic silver a lot. I have a week left on it. So we will see what happens. No matter what my hope is in Him not health. For I know my "normal" in this area will be variable and not like anyone else.
pop up Shoppe
At this point, the writer flings on a mangy dressing gown and hurtles down the passage to capture the new ideas before they take wing into the stratosphere.
I heard a surprised woman's voice "This is the ladies. The men's is on the other side." They laughed at her and said that was too far. Then they entered stalls.
I have a LOT more storage solutions to show you (like organizing in the playroom, which you've now got a sneak peek of) and organizing in the garage, the laundry room, my master closet and bathroom, meal planning, binders galore AND TONS more! So, if you don't follow my blog, feel free to do so, to stay updated on inspiring ways to simplify, create, organize and decorate.
1 can sweetened condensed milk, divided
Anyway, the fight went all the way to the City Council and an ordinance was passed that allowed for a "thinning out" of the flock. The city, apparently, would supervise the trapping of peafowl and shipping them off to what was described as a "sanctuary" in Colorado. The peafowl population dropped and neighbors started being pleasant to each other again.
I know that this isn’t much for today, I spent so much time on yesterday’s entry that I am behind again. On to Saturday.
It's snowing hard again today but luckily I managed to get to the fabric store yesterday just in time. (Unlike Meg of Shop the Garment District, who simply couldn't bear the cold to walk three blocks from her office during her lunch hour.)
That was the unspoken answer to the unspeakable question.
He's a kind soul and on paper, a suitable match. And he has 20 inch arms, which for me is as big of a draw as a hairy chest! He is, however, kinda dumb. OK, not even close to kind of. Talking to him makes me feel like I'm speaking to a five year old. I find myself using very basic language and even then I get a quizzical look from him. Can people find happiness with someone who does not have the same intellectual capacity? Or is this just a futile effort on my part?
MLSP is also a community which offers support from mentors that have succeeded in their MLM ventures. The mentors tell you about the secrets to earn bigger figures from your business. MLSP provides training for people who want to level up their MLM attempt and finally bear fruit from all their hard work in marketing. Online training is the trend these days, and MLSP has more than two hundred video webinars, and they release a new live webinar every Wednesday.
But my boss and co-workers did not.
I’ve worked with one little boy for three years now – and in a progress that has been halting, and at times excruciatingly frustrating, he has slowly, slowly learned the alphabet and basic phonics and a small memory store of “sight” words. Just in the last month or so, he has come close to being able to string enough words together that it is almost reading. (Lots of qualifiers here, still.) Every week, his painful efforts force me to really notice and think about what a mysterious and huge undertaking it is to learn the English written language.
Have you started to ponder on why your co-employees advance in their job way ahead of anybody else or get promoted faster and earlier?
Well yes and no..
Changes to the program:
I noted many's amazement in the rapidity in which I went from being closeted to being quite public. I can only validate this suddenness to my angst and anxiety which had been slowly and relentlessly building within me over the course of many years. It was akin to a balloon which was slowly inflated over time with pressure increasing to a point at which I could not contain it any longer. In getting out, I immediately surprised myself by the lack of fear which I had in so doing. I was in fact quite comfortable in submitting myself to what appeared to come quite naturally for me. this was both a blessing and a curse for it meant that I had tasted of a life which felt finally correct yet meant that I would have to return to live within the realm which the "guy" had created.
Yes, but it’s when those 80 seconds fit into the grand scheme of things. I’ve been sitting at my computer for four hours. That’s four hours I’ve been reading and replying to e-mails, reading and commenting on blogs and working on this post. It’s nearly lunchtime. Perhaps this wasn’t the best time to try and concentrate on one of Dave’s (or anyone else’s) poems.
A tight timetable
“You thought yourself invincible,” Jennifer said with unconcealed hate, “you said I would never touch a hair on your head.” With that, she reached up and yanked a patch of hair off Peter’s head causing pain to cascade all through his body. Peter could feel his heart exploding but it was not something quick and short but almost as if time had slowed to a crawl extending his torture. When the blackness started to envelop him it was a welcome release, but Abelle found a way to twist the knife one last time.
So there we were...me and my four little ones, just like we'd been 5 days ago. Sitting in the waiting room....waiting. Erik and Alex had been awarded "big boy status" and were now allowed to remain in the waiting room unattended while I ran through the necessary motions of the appointment. Ian on the other hand was allowed to bring one toy into the exam room, and (thank God for midwives) Ella just sat on my lap for the entire thing. We went through all of the normal stuff. Weight, urine, blood pressure, measurements, ect. Then last but not least, and my FAVORITE part of every appointment, the heart beat.
For me, these are quite simply the 2 dinners, the menus for which can be found in the previous two blog posts. I'm currently in the kitchen again, covering some staff holiday, and these two events have really got me thinking about the menus in different ways. Match of the entire weekend was a simple one for me - Ysbrid Y Ddraig, a whisky aged IPA, with Stilton. So simple, yet one of those combinations that improves everything about the individual ingredients.
We were very suprised to say the least, it was like the crooked house once they'd pulled all the vines away, all lopsided and looking very sorry for itself. However it worked out in our favour, because it meant I could have a few more studio spaces, and these ones are self contained!
Consider the following quote about martyrs and martyrdom:
” The worst solitude is to be destitute of sincere friendship.” Francis Bacon
Just when you thought it would be impossible to think any worse of our political class, look what the cunts do....
Jung Chang's grandmother was the daughter of a war lord and his concubine. This concubine, Jung Chang's great grandmother, was regarded as one of her father's greatest assets. She was beautiful with a slender frame and delicate features, and she also had 'lotus feet' achieved by binding and breaking bones when she was a toddler - an operation carried out by her mother. As I have mentioned before bound feet were supposed to be erotic and Jung Chang explains why. Men were supposed to find the helpless way of walking, and the woman's child-like dependency arousing some kind of protective feeling in the man. Youthful features are generally thought to be sexually attractive - it is thought to be one reason why blondes have more fun, and women constantly strive to look slim. All these features mimic the young of our species - and maybe the attraction of the new and unsullied. Maybe, in some way, the bound feet were associated with virginity.
Not happy.
There are, of course, people who need a second (or third) job; they don’t otherwise earn enough to cover basic needs. But I know a good number of people (of which I am one) who pick up extra jobs with the vague notion that these extra earnings will somehow convert themselves into greater financial freedom or greater savings. In reality, the additional income becomes a siren song; it encourages us to pay less attention to our finances because we have more to play with. Because it doesn’t (seemingly) disrupt our regular budget, we stop registering that what we are really doing is going over-budget each and every month.
Favorite ice cream in this household is mint chocolate chip, although that coconut cream pie shake that you mentioned sounds yummy.
Yes, there’s a lot of extra space. I’m paring way back; trying to be realistic about how much time I’ll be spending out there, and how many vegetables we’ll be using with Miss Chef hardly home to cook. So I was just going to add some basil, and maybe a couple of tomato plants.
I had to comment on something that I heard in the Republican debate the other day (yeah, I know, discussing the debates is getting old, but this is touching upon another topic). In his closing argument, Texas Governor Rick Perry said that we in this country need to get back to religious freedom and moral values - meaning that he wants the country to stop embracing religous freedom of non-christian religions, and instead adopt strict Christian moral principles.
Jessica Bumpus writes about how the fashion infrastructure is now changing in Pakistan. Fashion shows before were just a means of entertainment, but designers have come together to change that. It is now about providing a platform to the talented lot in Pakistan to display their designs, and it is focusing on growing. This definitely shows prospects. Thanks to Sunsilk, the excitement was felt all over the country over this fashion week, where designers like HSY, Karma, and Kamiar Rokni displayed their diverse fashion ranges. Soon the Pakistan Fashion industry will match all international standards. Kudus to all the hard work!
1 Peter 5:7 "Cast all your anxiety on Him because He cares for you."
At that time the world oil price was US$125 a barrel and it continued to rise to hover at US$140 a barrel at one time but has been on a downward trend since early this month.
Amir and Hassan’s favorite pastime is flying kites. In their town, there is a competition in which all the boys fly kites and try to cut the other kites down. The last one flying wins. As the kites fall, the kite runners retrieve them, and Hassan is the best kite runner there is. The year Amir wins the contest, Hassan runs to catch the last fallen kite and pays dearly for it.
“Give me my Romeo; and, when he shall die,
While waiting for the water to boil, add the oat bran and wheat bran (if using) to a 1/2 cup measuring cup and top up with the oats. If not using the brans, then just measure out 1/2 cup of oats.
Avery Brewing Company Testapils
I try not to think of him when I write anymore. I try to have it come from a place of pure fantasy. I don’t need to go driveling on about him.
I’m starting to wonder though if being late has just been a symptom – a bold indicator that there was something else out of whack in my life. An underlying lack of balance that just manifested in the clock jumping ahead to make me late. This week we’ve made it to Pre-K earlier than we have for months. And today we were there exactly on time. This after weeks and weeks of that inner clock of mine being convinced class started at 9, not 8:45 like it did for everyone else.
with G hook and "Ribbing" color- in this case Bright Blue
Clearly the media has a big part to play in educating our special needs children and clearly it's very effective when used correctly.
It can only encourage people to strive to do better, right?
“You may not be interested in war, but war is interested in you.” —Alan Furst (quoted in Dirty Snow)
Just before you are ready to eat add the remaining 2 tbsp of olive oil to a frying pan and fry the tortillas on both sides until crisp and golden. Put onto individual serving plates or if you prefer wrap in foil and keep warm. Using the same pan over a higher heat fry the eggs, spooning some of the oil over the top of them so that the yolks are cooked but still runny and the whites nice and golden and
even if Jordans not in my arms
gravy and cranberry sauce to accompany
Ok, this was meant to lead up to the Love Letter, but it turned into a TV Guide review.
What adventure is next?
Impunity Index Rating: 0.431 unsolved journalist murders per million inhabitants
Scattered memories. Coming faster now. Reliving.
My dear online Fran is exactly that......an earth born Angel. She always knows how to touch my heart and brighten my days.
May 03 1:25 AM
This is the view to the right of my desk - it's the side of my Expedit unit... they're all of my boys at different times when they've had passport pics taken - either for passports or for when they sign up for another season at football. You have to provide a pic of your child, so I've collected all the spare ones laying about and stuck them there. The bottom right is of my hubby and the kids when they were a bit younger. We are in the Bernabeu cafe under the stadium (which was a-mazing) when this was taken, in Madrid. We were there for our Birthday's Mine and DS1 - with DS2's Birthday being a week later. The funny looking white contraption is my front door bell and is there because I spend all day in the conservatory so would not hear a knock on the door otherwise. Our regular door bell gave up some time ago. This is a mobile unit so if we were in the garden, we could take it with us - although we've got a second unit - and have been known to put it under our eldest sons bed on the odd occasion lol.
I think this is a major problem and we’re making Queensland a kind of paradigm case of that. Once we’ve investigated Queensland fully, I think we’ll have a lot more to say about it.
Why did Newt appeal to SC voters? He came across as a firebrand ready to take on the administration without backing down, and he'd have dismantled Obama in each & every debate, of this I am certain. We appreciate that sort of passion here, the passion that said "We want more state freedom to govern ourselves with less interference from Washington". The closest thing we had to a firebreathing Tea Party guy. BUT....his own baggage came back to haunt him. That fiery bluntness translated to a certain unlikeability with many voters. His own past as a big government progressive establishment Republican, his ethics investigation, and his marital woes with his ex wives poisoned his campaign. I was willing to look past his past failings & hope that he would lead us back from where we are today but folks like me were few & far between.
The image above is just so beautiful, the dress is stunning and is totally inspiring me as I set off to create a collection of my own! So happy Wednesday everyone! Glad to be back!
Without doubt we are set to encounter scenes of devastation and heartbreak on an unprecedented scale.This cyclone is like nothing that we have ever deal t with before as a nation... the next 24 hours I think are going to be very, very tough ones for everyone."
2-02 Brian Eno & J. Peter Schwalm - Six Small Pictures 6:07
And, here we are...
All totaled, my six self-pubbed novels have sold over 235,000 copies on Kindle. And I made twice as much money per copy sold as I did on my legacy ebooks.
And part of the reason I like that song is because I’m never quite sure what it means. What exactly is the singer inclined to believe? What good time never seemed so good? Good as what? When was that?
This is Rondo’s second referee-related suspension in three months. He was also suspended for two games in February after zipping a ball at an official.
Daniel Martin (Irl) – Climber – Young prospect who’s shown well in a number of stage races. Expect to see him briefly as he has a tendency to fire out of the bunch on a climb and try to hang on (not often successfully)
we are returning
With the release of this book, the third book in her ongoing "Haanta" series, Michelle Franklin has quickly risen to the top of my 'Most Favourite Fantasy (with a hint of Historical Fiction) Authors' list.
WHY IT MATTERS: Many younger Christians today believe that Christianity is moralistic therapeutic deism. They think that the purpose of religion is to have good feelings and to be nice to other people and to make other people feel good. It’s all about feelings. You need to make sure that she knows how to make people feel bad and is comfortable doing it, with evidence. Middle knowledge also grounds the person’s willingness to see people as being responsible for their acceptance or rejection of Christ. Instead of taking a hands-off fatalistic approach to salvation, someone who accepts middle knowledge is going to take persuasion seriously and expend effort to try to change the people around them.
Emirates “will certainly not be making moneys from these emission allowances, as they are insufficient to cover our overall emissions” this year, and “onwards when the financial burden increases,” the company said in a statement.
AEnima: Tool- A band that I have tended to find a bit too complex for my taste much of the time, I would say they are one of my favorites. Though out of Maynard’s bands I am a bigger fan of A Perfect Circle. No offense. I think anything he makes is great. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U-IR9oNzdrA
Jasmin happened to have her baby shower while we were there too. I have to say, this was the biggest baby shower I have ever been to. Ever. It was catered and there was a DJ. It was a huge party! It was long, too. So, while Gabe spent plenty of time being his adorable self....
This comes from page 121 of Martha Stewart's Cookie Book, where the recipe is titled Lime Meltaways. When I first made these, I rolled the dough up and the first roll was dipped into sugar, like the recipe states. But then I was eating them and I saw a Dane who's in one of my classes, and I was reminded that if the extra sugar is taken away, they're very similar to Denmark's Jutlander cookies that are eaten over Christmas. So the next roll did not get the extra sugar. I liked them both ways. Y'all will have to decide for yourselves if you like them better with more sugar or less. But here's the recipe, regardless. Hope you enjoy!
Novels, music, and my friends.
I'm sick again. The pain kicks back in and I've had all the pain relief I'm allowed.
This 30-page story is inspired by Renae Rae's real-life lazy kitty. Einstein The Lazy Kitty, combines rhythmic writing and colorful illustrations to make this a short, fun book for all ages but it was designed with your toddler and early reader in mind. Although it can be viewed on a regular kindle, it is probably best viewed by a color reader or computer.
Yes, my training plan is in Excel format.
The next morning the phone rang quite a few times before my parents came down to see why were weren't up. I heard the door open, and I distinctly remember my dad's voice.
Download your FREE pattern here:
I'm LOVING this carnival theme....the colors would work so well with my room.
Elm Publishing provides additional services:
I couldn't find any of them on my hard drive
This is my second post about prayer, the part about confessing our sins. I’m just going to get to it.
Nature’s Challenge: Get to know yourself. You may be presently surprised.
Black Diamond Fireworks on Van Dyke, a 4,500-square-foot oasis filled with cases of sparkly explosives, opened this week to the curiosity and enthusiasm of a small but steady stream of customers relieved that they no longer have to travel to Ohio or Indiana and sneak certain fireworks back into Michigan.
‘You don’t even remember!’ Mary said.
ion, what is a Christian maternity care provider to do?=0AMy recently compl=
There was always a noise. A kind of soft clatter that reminded him somehow of his time in Indochina. It finally registered.
I galumphed through the snow and sat in the coffee shop, warm in my misery cloak. But I've never been able to keep those on for very long. I googled our top two kindergarten choices and saw that neither had gifted classrooms. Our number one school is un-discticted and un-zoned. Another option we're considering administers its own admissions test. I pulled my "poor-me" post from facebook. I called Auntie Suzie and we cracked up about Helen, at four, being to consigned to community college. But hey, as young immigrants we'd both started off at junior colleges and look at us now. I got off the phone feeling better.
Figures I pick the highway home with the most traffic. By this point cramping had also began. EXTREME FREAK OUT COMMENCE. A friend of mine lost her baby at 15 weeks and at this point all I could do was sit and go over her journal posts in my head. Its almost like my body knew something, was my subconcious trying to TELL me something? Be prepared? Oh its the worst feeling.
Love Walks In
well armed portion at that -- should "justice" not be done. Consider
This afternoon, I made a quick visit upstairs to her room to verify the location of the tooth. It was under her pillow, as usual, and it again had a note included with it. I'm pretty sure the Tooth Fairy is going to tell her that she can't grant the power to fly, but ummmm how exactly do I bring this up with her to find out why she needs to fly and who and how she is challenging (which is what I think the note says.
"As soon as you're initiated, my dear," replied the Baba Yaga. "Which will happen tonight. You can start your training tomorrow."
Anyway on to my card......the front is very identical to one I made a few months back. Loved the stamp and how I coloured so much, that I decided to do it again. I don't often make two the same but as this is a tri-fold card - it just gave it another look.
SRT members provide each other with technical/tangible support:
and I know that I am dying.
"So this is it boys and girls! Stay where you are and await the drop of my paw. When it goes down, RUN LIKE YE'VE NEVER FECKING RAN BEFORE!"
Bodhi lives at The Gentle Barn an animal rescue farm that takes in severely abused animals and rehabilitates them with medical care, massage, acupuncture, good eats and lots and lots of love.
Add little by little water to make a soft dough.
And then it occurred to me that I had, through these actions led them to hold the belief that not only were the Americans arseholes but that they were also separate from the rest of the world and were single handedly destroying it.
Doctors: Owen Brenman (Heston Carter)
¹ For instance, some Christians in the first century vigorously believed that Jesus would return in their lifetimes and that the end of the world was near.
Born Clotilde-Marie de Ficquelmont on the 3rd of April 1815, De Vaux has been condemned to be known throughout history by the name of her feckless husband. She married Amédée de Vaux, an adventurer when she turned 20, but after he was declared bankrupt following a series of gambling debts, he escaped to Belgium and left her alone and broke. As a divorce could not be declared, she was not able to remarry and thus was condemned to live as a spinster with no income. Her uncle gave her a pension which was just enough to pay for somewhere to live, whilst meals were mostly taken with her brother in his appartment.
This is my card for today ....
A rally in downtown Damascus earlier this month. (Khaled Al Hariri / Courtesy Reuters)
When we do meet up Adam tells me he decided on having a cupping treatment. I had heard about it before. A cup is heated over a flame (to draw out the air) and then it is placed on the body. The lack of air creates a suction which draws out toxins and evil spirits. Just kidding about the evil spirits part, it just sounded funny. Then he proceeds to lift up his shirt and I almost vomit right there on the heated floor. As you can tell by the picture he is covered in these horrible, perfectly circular, purple bruises. (As the week goes by they turn a gross yellow color)He claims it didn't hurt and a little old Korean lady was the one who did it. No, she was not in her underwear; I asked. And no, he was wearing shorts; I asked that too. She then gave him a foot and calve massage.
Do you know about Murale? If you've never heard of it, it's a beauty boutique opened by Shopppers Drug Mart. They carry a wide variety of products like NARS, Smashbox, Benefit, Cargo and...*gasp* Bobbi Brown!!!! I finally found somewhere that I get purchase Bobbi Brown products...without having to deal with the snooty service at Holt Renfrew, plus you can earn those Shoppers Drug Mart Optimum points at Murale.
Aliya Whiteley's novel Mean Mode Median has been reissued by the new electronic publishers, Thirst eDitions, and is currently available from Amazon as a Kindle edition at the promotional price of 77p.
Accessories: May Arts ribbon, sewing machine, Prima bling, Nestabilities
If you like my art and were inspired by my project please become a follower of my Doodle Pieces blog by clicking on the Join This Site button on the side bar on the left.
Ngauruhoe sits at the edge of the Mangetepopo valley – a drainage basin which feeds from the numerous vents of Tongariro volcanic complex, just a few miles from the much larger and more imposing Rhuapehu volcano. My targets were the 1975 pyroclastic deposits on the North Western flank of the volcano. These intercalate with a number of older leveed lava flows. They’re actually incredibly difficult to distinguish from each other on the photo above, but are basically the majority of the darker flow units reaching down toward the valley floor.
He also was named the Honors College’s Most Dedicated Student of the Year. In March he was named a Florida Coca-Cola New Century scholar. This followed his selection to the All-Florida First Academic Team.
My personal opinion is that I feel that it is just another day for younger ones to get sh**faced in the middle of the day in a public place. O don’t judge that, but I don’t understand it either. I’ve been there 3 years in a row. Always with different people. And yet I still haven’t found anything I enjoy about the park takeover. So, that is a bit on how I feel about 1st of May in Fælledparken…
Thanks for sharing a bit of your day with me and I'll be back with a new card as soon as I can.
Anderson Valley Boont Amber; Boonville, California, Amber Ale, 5.8% abv
It occurred to me while in the grocery store recently, that while my efforts to be cost-conscious and buy my beloved Cheap Beer are good for my budget, they weren't helping promote my efforts to write a beer blog. I mean, I love me some Miller Lite, but even I wouldn't read a Miller Lite Blog.
of wrinkles surrounding one radar-like eye. A patch covers
He took his time arriving, but when he decided to make an appearance he was outta there in less than half an hour! My brother and a nurse practically delivered him. (Love that bro says he tried to "stay away from the business end" lol.) My SIL Andrea was quite the trooper. I hear she didn't even cry... that seems inhuman. (Andrea, if you're reading this... know that I'm seriously considering the possibility that you are an alien who was sent here to quote Will Farrel with weirdo-little-sisters and populate the earth with incapacitatingly-cute offspring. I'm on to your master plan.) I'm very proud of them both for everything they're doing, and the strength of character it shows. You're both going to be rockin' rents, even if one of you is probably from Jupiter.
this was last night on the way home from school, got to love our ems
The Croke Park agreement will be cited against this proposal but it cannot be used to censor discussion. The problem with that agreement is that it defends equally the incomes of the rich as well as the poor among our public workers.
jenney & misty :)
I want you to hunger, crave for Me because you know that only I have the
She loves to make high pitch squeals like she's talking.
LLL: Initiated? A single image – a dream sequence – which became the first sentences of the first draft, long discarded. The novel is finished but needs certain revisions which I’ve planned but will undertake as the serialisation progresses. There are also certain scenes which I cut from the much longer original version and which I may decide to restore in one form or another. As it now stands, it’s about 350 pages in length.
Asian 26 (2.6%)
Here's my teaser for this week from Hereafter by Tara Hudson. And by the way, this book has nothing to do with the crappy Matt Damon movie with the same title. Just in case you saw it and were worried (cuz man that movie blew).
Rogerio Jelmayer – Dow Jones/WSJ, 01/23/2012
Brandon's mom would be heading out for the night about the time we arrived home from school. Now before you ask, no she was not a prostitute, but I yeah she was a whore. You've all heard of a crack whore but this woman was a whiskey whore. Gravelly of voice, wrinkly of skin, I suppose once upon a time she had been pretty. The remnants were there but only in a dimly lit, smoke-filled environment would the pieces of the faded puzzle fit together into a presentable package. I occasionally spent the night at Brandon's throughout junior high and high school and never did I see the same man at the breakfast table.
If you’re a gay person travelling through Spain there are few words you need to know. The first is: Ambiente. Literally translated to English that word means environment/atmosphere, but as gay slang, it means: A place with some gay atmosphere, girl! Well, it means anything gay, person, place or thing. If it’s from the environment, it’s gay.
-Nature does not hurry, yet everything is accomplished.
It was very important to know where to place patches. Sometimes it was a pimple or a tumour which needed to be cleverly concealed. Sometimes, it was a sign that was placed near dimples which, according to Cardinal de Bernis, gave so much grace to the royal favourite’s smile.
Honest honest.
Two bodies swaying, the Covenantal,
The body sheds its dying cells
Hell yeah
I love the nutty flavor of this delicious and nutritiuos vegetable!
334: Super des Fagnes Brune, caramel and cream, 7.5%
1/2 teaspoon ground cumin
Rojas: Can you share with our readers your favorite TV show and the last movie you saw?
Today’s discussion is on music, of course! I was driving home from work one morning and I tuned into a discussion on Elvis Duran and the Wink Morning Show. The debate was on Lionel Richie’s new album, Tuskegee. The album held the #1 spot on the Billboard Top 200 albums chart for 2 weeks, and is still in the top 5 for the 4th consecutive week. It features many of his classic songs, with 13 country artists.
Perhaps the departure of founding member bassist Craig Orzel in 2010 precipitated the change in direction but, more likely, the choice of famed dance producer Andrew Weatherall to “anti-produce” (best heard in the vocal mix of the first two tracks) the album was the decisive factor in harnessing the bands new sound. The Twilight Sad's expanses to a claustrophobic space of vintage drum machines, synths, and twisted shards of guitar. Whereas Forget The Night Ahead was claustrophobic, foreboding, and very much dominated by wall-of-sound guitars No One Can Ever Know ramps up the darkness to unprecedented levels while aligning the groups gloomy rock to new electronic sounds.
Last April, we welcomed Lisa Marie, of the charming Orange & Blossom shop, to Classic Bride to share a bit of her wedding planning with us. At the time, LM was deep in the throes of designing the wedding of her dreams, a vintage-style elopement in San Francisco. Lucky for us, that beautiful wedding has now taken place and I'm so excited to share with you a two-part series documenting LM's gorgeous day. Enjoy the photos and scroll down for some insight from the lovely bride as well as links to her previous planning posts on CB.
Yes, it is Monday and the time has "sprung forward" I am ready for a nap! This is my first card using
1 18-oz (or so) bottle barbecue sauce (I recommend Stubb's)
Another memory of him is from a trip I took to Italy when I was sixteen with various family members including him. At one point we were in Siena during The Palio, the famous horse race that turns the city into a madhouse, and we'd split up into smaller groups for the afternoon. A few hours later, when we'd regrouped, we realized he hadn't joined us. No one knew where he was. Everyone else in my family immediately became worried or outright frantic - what if he'd gotten lost or attacked or had sat down and dozed off somewhere? - and off they went searching for him. I stayed behind to keep watch at the spot where we'd all agreed to meet, in case he came along. And I remember standing there calmly, not worried at all, thinking to myself that at any moment he was going to come down that street, smiling and relaxed, and wonder what all the fuss was about. And that's exactly what happened. He suddenly appeared, strolling along the street, his smile a trifle sheepish and apologetic, and immediately set about deflecting criticism, soothing worries, and trying to coax people into laughing. I'm not sure what happened - it's very likely he had sat down for a spell and dozed off - but it didn't matter. No worries.
Items sewn (target 10): 7
I want to be like the leper who pleases the Lord with my thanksgiving; I don't want to be one of the other nine he inquires about with sadness. I want, like the silly picture above, to live as such that my name is synonymous with gratitude...though I am not sure how. I have read of those who keep "gratitude journals", who consider and record each moment of goodness; but I am most intrigued by those such as St. Faustina who find gratitude even in suffering, and marvel at their holiness:
They both nod to each other and she fiddles with the chain.
Quote: Great spirits have always encountered violent opposition from mediocre minds. ~ Albert Einstein
I’m coming up on 5 months since I lost David, I’m in the middle of mid-terms, and my birthday is next week. That’s right, I’m a stressed out widowed adoptee just about to have a birthday. Folks who know what this means are already looking for something to crawl under. So in lieu of felonious assault, here are my fuck yous for the year..
3. The Library Journal copy gives us more details about what Deanna will face from her family and from her school fellows. It also gives us more sense of this character’s intense isolation (which ratchets up the tension because we don’t know what Deanna might do—to herself or to others). I’m hooked.
Garlic paste:1 tbsp
Me: Elton John has hairless balls? What?
We were born to make manifest the glory of God within us.
I know women who believe God has denied any likeness to them in their femininity.
Matter-Table, Samij Datta, 2012
Before this I had to get money from the bank. I only got 10 Euro because I didnt want to spend more money. At midnight we arrived there and the first drink was for free and the second only cost 2 euro ^-^
It really IS sweet. Like your kid brother who collected monster figurines. Like Mark Petrie from Salem's Lot (pre-vampire hunting) and his collection of Hammer horror figures.
I really – I really wanted so badly to feel special to someone, to HIM. Many days he was – he was just – wonderful. I saw his “man gifts” and I loved every one of them. He was everything I could ever ask for in regards to “new love”. And then he withdraw – which I know now is natural but I was so – freshly wounded – I was driven by fear that I would lose this person who made me feel so right. And what do you do when you fear loss? You instinctively grab on. Nothing in your being tells you to let go. NOTHING. I have been miserable for years and now I feel so good with you and PLEASE don’t take it from me yet. Take it from me later if you must but PLEASE don’t take it from me yet.
Bryson sets a scene well and spends a fair amount of the book discussing what it was like living, working and dying in Shakespeare's day all of which helped build up a picture of the great playwright's life, even if the picture was blurry around the edges. I say this because we know shockingly little about Shakespeare's life for certain. In fact we can't even be sure what he looked like or even how best to spell his name! Bryson is perfectly honest and open about this from right at the beginning of the book. In fact many stories stated as fact in other books are often only legends with no evidence whatsoever to back them up. I think Bryson sucessfully debunked some absolute nonsense that has been written about the Bard for the last few hundred years especially the ridiculous theories that Shakespeare didn't write his own plays.
Last week, I went to a shopping event put on by Lou Lou magazine called Shop Til You Drop. I lined up early with a friend of mine and we got awesome swag bags filled with samples, coupons, and other awesome free stuff. In the bag was this nail polish! Needless to say this was one of my favourite goodies :D
And earn a fortune from his name, he needn’t play another game…
And I will purge thy mortal grossness so,
Palm to palm apathy, we commiserate in a kiss
Power should be devolved to the lowest level possible so that local communities can make decisions which affect them.
What I got out of this accumulation of detail was that, yes, Dick Clark did encourage performers to come back to show business after their personal crises (Gloria Estefan noted he was very helpful to her after her bus crash in the Nineties), but even if they shouldn’t be appearing on stage. Ms. Francis is a tragic and heroic figure for all the stuff she’s gone through in her life — and one gets the feeling that she would have been much better off
Can you see it nestled in the valley, behind the wonderful dry stone wall? I LOVE these walls. I remember them as a major feature of my childhood .You can sit and shelter from the wind behind them and there are loads of toe and hand holes if you are a little person wondering what's on the other side . Just be careful not to skin your knees on the scratchy Millstone Grit.
Brian Jonestown Massacre- Aufheben
15And they came to the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half-tribe of Manasseh, to the land of Gilead, and said to them,
It also doesn't take long to realise that basements are good for a lot of things; storing bicycles, hiding boyfriends, even raising children you fathered with your daughter, but they seldom make for light, airy, sweet smelling living spaces.
and in my opinion, it's not wrong to want to look good. not at all.
We did have sex on Tuesday night. He fucked every which way, but loose. Started out in missionary, then me sideways and Him on His knees, then moved on to doggy style, then ended with my ass over the bed and Him standing over me. He played with my clit while fucking me which made me squirt everywhere and He came with me squirting all over His cock. If I was guessing this is His favorite way to come.
My second suitor was a semi-retired senior who’d moved from Vancouver to Cape Breton. He wasn’t quite so plainspoken, but I sensed, had I given a little encouragement, he might have made the ask. He mentioned three times he was looking for a nice lady and still hadn’t found her, then went on to detail his reasonable financial situation and solid work history.
Rise from ashes
My first instinct was NOT to stand there and laugh along with the other kids who were just glad it wasn't them, or to jump in and help the older "cool" kids. My instinct was to pull them off and start handing out ass-kickings, which is exactly what I did.
It’s interesting how much more mindful I am of the “balance” of my life now that I’ve listed that as my word to focus on this year. I always had issues with resolutions, and this is much less of a resolution and much more of a constant reminder – it seems to be working so much better.
DW: So you’re saying that these underground nuclear strikes against the bases…
16. Waitin' On A Woman (With Andy Griffith)
Whoa! Keep yourself? There goes my message or many not.
Apparently the untimely death of Mark Hellinger meant that the original script was revised and certain aspects of the story were changed. Be that as it may, the movie that we ended up with is almost impossible to fault and Daniel Fuchs’ script successfully blends the heist and Steve’s obsessive love to powerful effect. Flashback structures can sometimes be confusing or upset the mood of a film but in this case it works perfectly, coming at precisely the right point and filling in the background details that are vital to understanding the nature of Steve and Anna’s relationship. With a tight script, and Franz Planer’s photographic talents, in place, director Robert Siodmak was free to put it all together with his customary visual flair. The opening, which I referred to earlier, pitches the viewer headlong into this complex tale of dishonour and betrayal in incredibly stylish fashion. And it never really lets up from that moment, with one memorable and superbly shot scene following hard on the heels of another. Siodmak uses every trick up his sleeve to manipulate the mood and perspective, from coldly objective overheads to disconcerting low angles and close-ups, interspersed with fast cuts and dissolves. For me, the real stand out scenes, although there’s hardly a poor moment throughout, are the ones in Union Station and in the hospital. The former not only gives a fascinating glimpse of contemporary LA bustle, but also shows the director’s skill in composing a complex series of shots in a crowded environment while retaining control of the geography. In the latter, he uses the reflection from the mirror in Steve’s room to break up the static nature of the setup and extract the maximum amount of tension at the same time.
Overview of Replica Watches
Gen Y folk are, in a broad-general-sweeping-way, without dependents to look after. Financial burdens are at an all-time low. If you don’t know what you’re passionate about and are scared to start a career because you’re worried you might make the wrong choice.. what better time to make the wrong choice than now, when you’re.. well.. FREE? That way, you figure out what works and what doesn’t early on so that you can move forward sooner.
The silence of the trail only worsened his mood. The noisy chatter of the city and suburbs provided a comfort zone he only missed when it wasn’t present. Even a random curse, or the screech of a cars wheels, here he didn’t even hear the sound of noisy insects, not even the wind rustling the trees.
Tonight's game was intense and insane to say the least. It was close, ugly, painful, beautiful, and incredible. We made some pretty 3 pointers and some had some hard falls.
So fondly nicknamed "the most annoying dog in the world", Fifi does not know that she is a dog. At just 4 pounds, she is my little sidekick that goes with me everywhere. (Literally...if I go into the bathroom she will sit outside the door and whine until I come out) If we go somewhere for the weekend, she jumps right up in to the suburban and rides along with us.
Broth and jello.
(All made from recipes in Mom's memory.)
Buy your own bloody washing up liquid AND your own bloody loo roll.
Not really self-imposed as much as a victim of circumstance. Or as I like to call: "Living the Stranded Lifestyle." In other words, work like a dog and get rewarded... with more work. Pavlov kind of missed the mark and should have studied my employer instead.
Clearly, I am not referring to transforming into a golden-skinned, perfectly groomed Goddess, but merely to being a person with a shoulder-length bob.
The research documented in this work is an attempt to understand differences between the three main races (Orientals, Caucasians, and Blacks) in terms of life-history evolution. In other words, that separate races of human beings evolved different strategies to cope with different environments and that these strategies lead to various physical differences.
A bite of this fudgesicle is like feasting on a slice of frozen hot chocolate. And there’s no better way to satisfy your sweet tooth than with decadent chocolate treat—and that too in popsicle form. Perfect for the weather!
“So, what do you think? With God on our side like this, how can we lose? If God didn’t hesitate to put everything on the line for us, embracing our condition and exposing himself to the worst by sending his own Son, is there anything else he wouldn’t gladly and freely do for us? And who would dare tangle with God by messing with one of God’s chosen? Who would dare even to point a finger? The One who died for us—who was raised to life for us!—is in the presence of God at this very moment sticking up for us. Do you think anyone is going to be able to drive a wedge between us and Christ’s love for us? There is no way! Not trouble, not hard times, not hatred, not hunger, not homelessness, not bullying threats, not backstabbing, not even the worst sins listed in Scripture … I’m absolutely convinced that nothing—nothing living or dead, angelic or demonic, today or tomorrow, high or low, thinkable or unthinkable—absolutely nothing can get between us and God’s love because of the way that Jesus our Master has embraced us.” Romans 8:31-39 The Message version
dipped and then green after a week of un-taste.
Really Liz.
11:15 Chair: Professor Andrew Prescott, Hatii, University of Glasgow
She proceeded to tell me how she lives in this little town way out in the middle of nowhere and reads my blog regularly (which of course is a very nice compliment) and how I had written absolutely nothing in weeks!!
Its back to school time again! You can take a breath for just a second... You've done your school shopping and routines are set in place for the year.. Paper Issues theme for this month is: The Learning Curve. Think about back to school, sports, drill team..or you can apply it to yourself, how you have grown and changed..Life lessons over the years. This theme has so many possibilities.
Diamonds and Toads by The Brothers Grimm
The belief that any regulation could prevent the next crisis is foolish. Like clockwork, there has been an economic downturn every ten years for the last 400 years at least. Even though he is not willing to come right out and say it, Chait does seem to admit the futility of tough regulation. As he says, these reforms “could possibly prove useless.” And yet, despite this, he calls for the “the toughest, most anti-Wall Street reform possible.”
Courtney Kovalan
2. Applicant must be willing to create a well written blog post for each
I've learned never to make a promise I can't keep. If I make a promise to you, you can bet your life on me keeping it. A long time ago, I broke more promises than I can count, and I still remember the look in the eyes of those I let down. Never again.
91,000 Word count
So without further adeau…I give you my version of gluten-free puff pastry wrapped around sweet, warm and juicy apple filling in these try to eat just one “Mini Apple Pie Pockets”.
Stand by your man
The first round of the Letter Land Party! I introduce a new letter/sound each day. I have all of the kids' names written on a sentence strip. I always try to put the girls and boys on a different color. I place all of the names in a pocket chart. We then go through the names. Anyone that has the letter in their name, then they go to the top of the pocket chart. If they do not, then they go at the bottom. IF their name begins with that letter, then they are the King/Queen of the day.
What I can say for sure is brining works big time. Don't even bother roasting one if it hasn't been brined, in my opinion. The good news is that Trader Joe's sells ones that are already brined! For like $1.99/lb.! So you don't have to use a huge garbage bag of salt water in a cooler (or bathtub of ice, which happened to me one year as I recall). Oh, and it is my understanding that kosher turkeys have already been salt treated so they are (effectively) brined, so if you can find one of those, that will save you some time as well.
Mr. Sim has spent this past year W-A-I-T-I-N-G for school to start! He and the Bubbs are so close in age and have done pretty much everything together that the separation was a bit hard on him. In other news, it has been nice for the Buns because the two of them have become pretty good friends, playing together every morning after seminary while I rest a little before the Buggs gets up.
Timothy John Hargrave, 38, Readington, N.J.
One of my many adventures involving archival fieldwork brought me to the small town of Wilton, Maine. I’d been hired to spend several work days there to organize their local manuscript collections and train a group of volunteers to continue the process. It is always a true labor of love and an honor to be called upon to help preserve the documentary heritage of my home state. By phone, in advance, I’d been told about a Civil War “secretary” by my hosts in Wilton. Once I arrived, I found out what that was. Apparently, so did a crowd of townspeople; they were told the archivist would know how to open the mysterious 19th century box, then we’d all find out what was in it. Immediately, I was set to the task- and fortunately by moving the desktop-sized polished wooden box on my lap, I was able to find the series of concealed inlaid rods which required some pressing-in so the lid could be opened. The box had been the portable desk of a Union Army officer who hailed from this little Maine town, and inside it were his spectacles, gloves, uniform épaulettes, and a number of handwritten documents. We catalogued the box itself, as well as its contents, setting the tone for the rest of the project’s work. This occasion comes to mind when I imagine time-capsules and their discoveries. We “store” experiences, names, sounds, and pictures within our memories. The human soul is inherently something of a time-capsule. As with the Union captain’s artifacts, we create our own museums and shrines- with both artifacts and recollections. Being our own curators, we each provide the interpretive narration. What accompanies our journeys? Do our narratives proceed with us, and do they evolve? Are the stored memories stagnant? If the human time-capsule warrants our preservation, there must surely be purpose to our curatorial commitments.
The odds are stacked against that. The hardliners who run the military and security services are implacably against it.
GasBuddy (https://www.gasbuddytv.com , the “Smart Way to Pump Your Gas” announced today plans to present the product in a national televsion info commercial.
They said that she had found the love she waited for
“Man City will surely win the title.”
Shaved Parmesan (for garnish)
I've been preoccupied with selling 105 cases of Girl Guide cookies. I was starting to dream about Girl Guide cookies although, ironically, I can't even eat the damn things since they're chalk full of gluten.
Ter Haar, G, Halfway to Paradise: African Christians in Europe, Cardiff, Cardiff Academic Press, 1998.
The Places You’ll Go by Dr Seuss
Our project list is pretty hefty this time around:
‘What book did you read?’
The food was good, the members took care of me well, so I felt very comfortable. Hehehe.
But as much as I love mozzarella sticks, I find the process of making them unappealing. Dip the cheese in flour, then egg, then breadcrumbs, then fry and watch the cheese ooze out into the oil. No thanks. It tends to make a mess of me and my kitchen, and it still does not taste as good as I can get from a pizza shop.
this small one to boost my energy
I feel a lot of connection with this. I wasn't a creative writer in college, I didn't take comparative literature classes or English classes, there were students who were into the avant-garde and I was into smoking pot and going to frat parties and generally, fucking up, terribly fucking up, not in the admirable way Susie Bright describes here the slut-dyke-punk scene in California in the late 70s which reminds me of Lidia's story "Loving Dora" that I will write about in next post!, I was never part of a subculture, if anything my friends in high school were more akin to a Trench Coat Mafia pre-Columbine, we were the losers, the misfits, we got good grades and listened to Nine Inch Nails and Trent Reznor and had bonfires on the beach where we smoked cigarettes but were never going to be the thinkers, the visionaries, because we were disciplined so harshly by our parents to be good, we rebelled in other ways, cliched ways, secret ways, because parental consent was so important to us.
Cover the pot with a lid and bring to a boil. Reduce heat, and simmer for about 20-30 minutes. I usually taste the liquid after about 20 minutes and judge from there. If you want a stronger flavor, keep it cooking longer. I don't recommend going past about 30 minutes though, because it can get bitter.
It now belongs to the town
Nothing ever came out of this, not even a kiss, but I felt he was keeping me hanging on a string by sometimes seeming so interested in me and then backing away back and forth.
Today I had my annual physical and what Karla and I refer to as "the poke."
It shouldn’t be my burden. But it is.
Samson loved her in a way that no one else could. He never disappointed her, never took her for granted, never demanded anything more than her time and tummy rubs. Sophie broke off her relationship with her boyfriend and stopped going out for drinks with her friends. She had few visitors; Samson made people uncomfortable, everyone but Sophie.
You need to burn more calories than you consume. And by burn, I mean sweat your ass off... not a casual jog around the park. Several times a week, I put in two-a-days (workout in the morning and again at night) to cash in on the magical "afterburn". The longer and harder you workout, the greater the post-exercise metabolism increase and the longer it lasts. During the final week of the weight loss challenge, I did two-a-days every. single. day. Exhausted, but I eliminated nearly 5 lbs over a 5 day period (making up for that week-long vacation!).
I really don’t know anymore and am finding it difficult to accept intense emotions which occur from everyday experiences. If I am excessively angry about something, I know invariably this is part of Bipolar (by excessively angry I guess I mean overreacting with rage to tiny little things). As part of Bipolar I know the emotions can be intensified dramatically, so subconsciously I think I must discount them as not quite real, therefore not to be trusted- like a delusion. And so I deny them. In my head I’m thinking:
The Black Prism (of the new Lightbringer series), takes place in a totally different world. Magic works in a bit of a unique way. People born with this talent (drafting) use visible colours (and two invisible ones, super-violet and sub-red), to power their magic. Not only does each colour create a different type or flavor of magic, it also has resonance with feelings and emotions. Blue, for example, is hard and brittle, and embodies cold logic and reasoning.
I love that he never gives up on anything. He's so stubborn sometimes but he's so persistent.
The Taj Mahal (1628) Love for wife in this mausoleum for woman who was so special to him, the mother of his children (no mention of other wives and other children)
All through the service, Mattias chatted to us about the food he was serving, and his huge passion was continually evident. He’s also a fantastic character, and it was a pleasure to spend time in his kitchen. He also put up with what turned out to be a very talkative group of foodies and didn’t seem to mind our incessant chatter about all things food related!
Being in a different relationship where my partner actually contributes emotionally, physically and financially, I have come to realize that I really don’t “need” anything that money can buy. This realization has been so freeing… take for instance “the house“… I hung on to that for years. It was “my house” and I felt that I needed it… it was my identity, an accomplishment, a security blanket.
So, biscuit ambade are actually gram fritters. They are made with cleaned urad dal (black gram, that's actually white after its cleaned, to add to the confusion!) with some coconut and a few seasonings... and are utterly delicious! Crispy and golden brown on the outside, and soft and fluffy on the inside, with the hot bite of green chilli, black pepper and ginger and the subtle smokiness of the curry leaves and the delicate, sweet and calming bite of coconut. Another winner from the streets of the Konkan coast.
$75 hot dogs
Ya know, some of the things I feature here at this blog make it really, really hard to post without dissolving into puddles of sarcasm. When you watch this video you’ll see why.
Great blog Chloe. Love,
I refuse to prejudge the issues here, though I find my credulity stretched to the limits. There is, according to some reports, an international market in stolen sperm, a commodity so plentiful, so readily given - some even paying for the pleasure - it beggars belief that it has any value at all. It’s as well to remember also that Zimbabwe is a country run by Robert Mugabe, where scapegoats and diversions from the misery of everyday life are always welcome. Meanwhile the country’s tourist board could mount a new campaign; not come to Zimbabwe but come in Zimbabwe.
Chapters, online, small local bookshops
As the inquiry enters its final week, it has moved from examining whether the council and Arrowcroft’s scheme should be granted planning permission, to whether it should be allowed to use a CPO to purchase the land.
Don’t yield this the amiss way. I am by no agency adage that it is accept to buy your seven-year-old that M-rated game. I am a able adherent of the ESRB. The botheration is that the bodies who accuse the a lot of about inappropriate agreeable in video amateur are usually the ones a lot of amenable for advertisement their accouchement to it. You can’t buy your adolescent God of War and afresh accuse about claret and bald breasts in the game. The bold case says, in actuality in atramentous and white, “Blood and Gore” and “Nudity” a allotment of its agreeable descriptors. The ESRB ratings accept existed for fifteen years now, and arise on both the bold case (front and back, with descriptors on the back) and on the characterization of every video game. In fact, they are larger, added prominent, and bigger explained than a lot of added ratings systems; yet apparently the atomic heeded.
I feel that in order to answer these questions, you have to be true to yourself. You have to be vulnerable and experience everything you can in this life. It is happening now! Not tomorrow, next week, next month, next year or five years from now. NOW!
Top 10 MBAs—but they will regardless be incredibly impressed with your fluency in Spanish upon graduation. IESE requires all students to be business proficient in Spanish before leaving Barcelona, and employers will certainly value that prime asset alongside your rigorous exposure to the case method.
Life’s full of tough choices, isn’t it? –Ursula (The Little Mermaid)
I'm 99% sure that the author of the book was a guy.
To achieve their aim, the BBC were prepared to sacrifice any pretence of impartiality or the long vaunted claim that the audience for such shows are “representative of the public at large”, a claim we always knew was false but now irrevocably exposed as a lie. The vast majority of the audience were clearly hand picked BNP opponents. Advanced publicity claimed that there would be BNP supporters in the audience, but they were vastly outnumbered and largely ignored by Dimbleby when selecting contributions from the floor.
Me and some of the girls from work went back to Michay’s apartment after dinner for a girl’s night. We were going to play a game, but started talking and that didn’t stop for hours. It was so therapeutic to hear that we had all been through it and were still surviving. When I got home at nearly 2am Mr. Big still wasn’t home (when he finally got home he still had the arm band on from whatever club he had been at). When I got home he had cleaned out two of his dresser drawers and threw all his shirts on the floor. I was a little relieved because that meant that he was taking steps to move forward. I knew he was hurting….but I was hurting too…really bad.
But this time we wanted to give it a try and "dress up".
Now, the Government is coming to the rescue of commuters in Kelantan with an injection of RM16.1mil to keep bus services in the PAS-controlled state afloat.
And truthfully, it has probably been my favorite because the other “popular” season, spring, was so brutal for so long. For me, having lost my mom in spring when I was 18, that season meant the pain of audaciously beautiful flowers, Mother’s Day, and Memorial Day— a season which obnoxiously insisted on glowing every year, despite the pain it represented. The fertile promise of spring seemed wasted on me. The pungent smell of soil, which used to entice me, just reminded me of loss.
Did she see the play? Did she understand? Surely she did.
storm hub at the station
Leksjone 9 med tema Perfect Pearls ♥
Noteworthy: Pretty good numbers for a rookie, 8th in WHIP, 5th in hits/9 innings, 2nd in K's/9 innings.
In the case of MAS and AirAsia, it need not be at the expense of each other or encroaching on each other s brand identity.
-Come on ....said the Dutchess a bit worried...this is not like you at all....cheer up dear..
Technically, a recession occurs after two consecutive quarters of negative growth. The ONS figures said Britain’s GDP in the last quarter of 2011 dropped by 0.3 percent. Britain last experienced recession in 2009.
It’s obvious from Howe’s work that opening a deli is hard and thankless work. He doesn’t sugar coat anything – in fact, he’s embraced the arduous struggles he and his family go through. Still, this isn’t a dour read – it’s funny, often laugh-out-loud funny. It’s a memorable tome and if anything it gives me a tiny bit more perspective when I walk into a 7-11.
Pile on lightly toasted bread – preferably sourdough rye, if you’ve got some – and serve open-faced.
2- Place the butter, the 1/3 cup of sugar and salt in a mixing bowl and mix well with a wooden spoon. Add the lemon zest and vanilla extract and mix until well incorporated.
1928, US, directed by Tod Browning
But not everything is wine and roses in Oh, Canada. Recently there has been some conflict between the English-speaking Canadians and the Fucking French-speaking Canadians. Apparently, some people in Canada were not informed until recently that Canada is under British rule and had been brought up to believe they are actually in a very cold region of France. This was discovered about 10 years ago when they went out to witness Lance Armstrong at the Tour de France (Le Tour de Sainte Genevieve) only to instead see Matthew "Skeeter" Thomas riding a two-person bike by himself through the city streets. Because of this, the Fucking French Canadians want to form their own nation which would be known as Quebec (pronounced "Rhode Island").
The book is about the lives of some of the ladies who have achieved the impossible in the Indian corporate world. The stories are not boring biographies but an insight into the minds and souls of these women who worked hard to achieve what they did, the motivation, inspiration and self belief that kept them going in a society that has always looked down upon women, in a society where women have to fight for their rights and their place under the sun.
I hope you have all had a great bank holiday break.
Davis conducted a survey to assess the extent of ab initio provision in UK universities and received responses from 26 universities. Ab initio provision was found to be very diverse with Spanish the language most commonly offered to beginners. Entry requirements were varied and ranged from two A-levels in other languages to evidence of language learning ability. Davis also reported on extra resources being offered to ab initio students.
The reason is simple, I have way to much skincare products for one girl to have and even my mother keeps telling me that I can open up a mine skincare store right out of my bathroom. Of course she was just joking when said that at the same times as teasing me for the amount of products that I do have.
Oh, and BTW, this is what a $144.98 funeral looks like:
And in honor of “May Day”:
According to a study published Friday in the journal Science, a team of British, German and Canadian researchers have shown that this newly-discovered plant that has evolved to reflect back especially audible ultrasound waves. Marcgravia evenia achieves this through concave, spherically shaped leaves.
“adv” or “advanced” routes V5-V8 and upwards…
Philip Goldberg is a spiritual counselor, public speaker, and author or coauthor of numerous books. His latest publication is American Veda: From Emerson and the Beatles to Yoga and Meditation, How Indian Spirituality Changed the West. His websites are www.AmericanVeda.com and www.PhilipGoldberg.com
The woman at the centre of the case is a 20-year-old blonde called Mariah Yeater. She alleges that Master Bieber invited her backstage after a concert and offered her the honour of popping his cherry. He declined to use a condom (she says) because he didn’t want his first sexual experience to be like paddling in Wellington boots. After 30-seconds of breathless coupling, Bieber was a spent force, and disengaged shamefacedly from his concubine. Apparently, he had expected to pound away for 50 minutes like Dirk Diggler in Boogie Nights. Children often get unrealistic expectations from what they see in movies.
It’s packaged in a surprisingly heavy DVD case. Maybe I’ve gotten use to studios using the cheaper and thinner eco-cases, but this case is nice. My Only complaint is that the box is a bit bowed leaving a gap on the closing seam on the top and bottom. I imagine this is from the case not having been closed as soon it was made, and rather closed when the DVD was ordered. A few weeks on a tight shelf should fix that in no time.
"Well, do you want to run an errand with me? We could go grocery shopping, or - this is pretty random - we could go register for my friend for her wedding."
(Encore #2)
"How much do you want?"
And if that better way ain’t so
My artwork wildly ranges and includes face painting and make up art work. Yesterday I had to create some zombies and because of short notice and being pressed for time I was unfocused and could not be more unfocused on perfection then getting it done in time. I always kick myself for being unfocused but somehow I always get the job done, with satisfied customers. Here is my focused with unfocused pieces!
Valles said he tracked down Redelfs at the children's party and then handed off the hit to others. He said the killing of the factory supervisor was a mistake because he was driving a white SUV similar to Redelfs's.
The changes that America has undergone are not only significant in themselves, they also have severe journalistic repercussions. These have beeb clearly revealed in the Derbyshire case. While the old National Review could critique the nation as a whole and examine the most important issues, including race, with a degree of frankness and honesty, the present day mainstream media do so at their peril.
wilderbeat migrating
So, those are just some random updates. I'll be back soon!
Kennedy personally rejected the Northwoods proposal. After his death, it was shown that the Northwoods existed on paper. (Link)
We are all here to serve in some greater capacity. What’s your level of service going to be?
Dry roast grated coconut till golden brown ,cool it.Grind it to a smooth paste and keep it aside.chop onion and tomato.crush ginger and garlic.heat oil in a pan ,add onion ,sliced coconut and slit green chillies.saute till light golden brown color .Add crushed ginger -garlic fry for 2 min .Add all powdered masalas saute for 1 to 2 min in low flame.Now add tomato pieces fry till tomatoes become soft and mushy.Add chicken pieces and salt to this and saute for 3 minutes.To this add grind coconut paste and 1/2 cup water.Mix well cover and cook till the chicken is done.
For obsessive nerds: Coleridge recalled in Biographia Literaria, published in 1817:
SIMPLE....EASY...SWEET ...!
On a floured surface, knead for approximately 5 minutes. Place dough in an oiled bowl, cover and let sit in a warm spot until doubled in size (about two hours).
Chetan might have lashed out at Narayan Murthy for saying that coaching classes have led to the deterioration of the quality of IIT and IIM-produced students, but his book remarkably suggests exactly the same. So either Chetan doesn’t believe what he promotes, or he forgot what he wrote in the first place. Or may be he just wanted media attention or acted like Gopal in the story.
I think what really put me in the spirit last night was the Gronk contest. Watching a bunch of grown men (and a couple of ladies) doing crazy things to spike the ball like Gronk was priceless. But hey, tickets to the game for the winner will make people do just about anything, such as stripping down to almost nothing in the freezing cold to try to impress the judges. Too bad that he was more impressive with the clothes on so he didn't fair to well. But there are now going to be four happy people sitting at Gillette tomorrow night thanks to their ability to Gronk.
Roger is, as has become standard for him, skeptical when Beck claims that he has a Memory that told him that Roger pilots the Big O. But he also doesn’t have any alternative theories as to why the man would know it.
There is precious comfort in the assurance that when we thus pray we are not talking into the air.
Imaging
Regular readers will be familiar with the fact that I am a 30adayDan in Smokedo. I still continue to practise the arcane art of smoking while I do weights and press-ups et al. Now, a recycled elephant is in on the action. Discerning viewers will note the subtle touch of using a match with the tip painted red for a Marlboro.
Sigue Sigue Sputnik Love missile F 1-11 UK
approximate net profit of $27 Billion USD. This would be a low-end
1Then the heads of the families of the Levites came to Eleazar the priest and Joshua, the son of Nun, and to the heads of families of the tribes of the children of Israel;
Pictured above is my own plate with Snow White and the seven dwarfs, from 35 years ago.
So, baby steps I think. Since my husband said it to me, I’ve taken those words into mind even while drinking/drunk… and it’s kept me on the right edge of sanity.
Considering it’s in early development, plot details are scarce — but if we go by what Variety is saying, it is, indeed, based on a comic book/novel series from writers Flint Dille and David Marconi that lasted from 1986-1988, one which mixes science fiction with the setting of the 1930′s, giving it a pulpy dime novel feel. (In addition to two graphic novels, Agent 13 also spawned three “regular” novels.) With the title character being male, it’s a good bet that Theron won’t be playing the lead — unless they’ve changed up the story — but will factor into the movie in a prominent role in some other way. Maybe a villain?
France is charged with abandoning and cruelty to four to 10 animals, a two-year felony. He will be arraigned today in 33rd District Court in Woodhaven.
Growing up, I had a really good church experience. I wasn’t in one of those ultra-conservative, dogmatic churches. I didn’t have family that pushed religion on me. I came to a lot of Christianity with the help of both church and family—but in a way that was mine.
Last night Mr Doncaster, Chief Executive of the SPL, appeared on Sportsound. On each hearing I gain the impression that some more straightforward version of my “Switcheroo” plan might have been canvassed with him, and not fully ruled out.
The shrubs and trees, (as I lift my eyes they seem to be stealthily
Yeah…I’m a bad person.
So on Tuesday evening I shocked my future employer and my family by announcing that I would be staying put. My boss at my current job told me she knew I wouldn't leave. She has a philosophy she calls "Let go, let God". I started thinking about that and how if I truly had faith, I would trust that God would see me through the challenges of my current job, not the least of which is the commute.
Paper: Raspberry Fizz, Basic Black, Basic Grey, Pretty In Pink, White
Grammo wants to get some organization into the chores around here so they can keep the place clean and picked up while I'm sick. I think they're in for a bit of a shock.
cacophonies, fountains of wild sweet Robin music
A resident, who lives just metres from where the incident occurred, heard what happened next.
Tonight I sat and experienced Pujiya Swamiji and H.H. Sri Shankaracharya Swami Divyanand Teerthji talk at Golden Bridge Yoga Studio in Hollywood. Pujiya Swamiji made reference to Hollywood being able to be our Holy-wood, saying we can still practice yoga like he and other yogis do in a caves in India. We can create our own cave here in Hollywood, our very own Holy-wood. He talked about how busy we are with things like twitter and facebook and “it’s great to connect, but don’t lose your sadhana! It is most important to come back to yourself and God – every day + night…” OK, that’s what I needed to hear. Sometimes, I get so caught up in my mind, it stops me from doing my practice of mantra and silence everyday. My mind is very active everyday, all the time. If letting the mind run was a event at the Olympics, I would win the Gold.
Does it have to be my own design?
worship music.
In a wonderful moment of synchronicity, a few weeks after the screening, I caught a brilliant report on Radio 4′s Today Show about Coordinated Universal Time, the Leap Second and the recent controversy over the proposal to abolish it – confirming this initial impression. For in today’s hyper-connected world, time is more than just a useful means of marking out the day. Time and time management is an industry. All of our enterprise and activities depend on it. Time determines our reliability and worth to others. And we’re held to account for how we spend it. Time can make you feel powerless. But herein lies the paradox and power of Marclay’s creation. For in raising our consciousness about the nature of time, he breaks – at least temporarily – its hold over us.
Afterwards was the opening night party replete with fog and lasers and a video D.J. playing music by the Black Eyed Peas, but the volume was at a reasonable level since the doors were open. I said a few hellos, I was interviewed by SRQ Magazine (it's not up yet and lord knows if they'll put it up), I met Frank Langella, and I had a chocolate cake pop, then I walked my ass home.
Despite my reservations about the film, Malcolm X is often riveting and works well as a sort of historical Cliff Note on the life of a man few today know much about. By the time, Lee brings Malcolm's story to a close with two powerful epilogues, most of the gaps the film has had until that point are filled and Malcolm's message becomes loud and clear, resonating with the viewer long after the credits end.
Oh my! I never expected to take this much of a break from blogger world but life as I KNEW it has totally taken quite the turn.
Second, we had a fundraiser at Margarita’s Mexican restaurant in Keene – what a blast! We had a great turnout and more importantly, a great time. We’ll definitely have to do this again. Thanks to everyone for their support! Click here for photos.
I have a feeling there won't be much cooking again next week, but I will still plan, just in case.
It was 95 degrees that morning and, because of the Satan Ana winds, we were kind of afraid to take off our jackets, so naturally a breakfast of ice cream sundaes at Gibson Girl Ice Cream Parlor for breakfast seemed like a stellar move! Mmmmmmmmmm!
First Sentence: The clock says 6:45, even though it's really 6:25.
There is an expression that says, “Eyes are the windows to the soul”. When taking a picture we tend to search the photo for the subjects eyes. There are two things I like to do when I photograph a subject, including pets.
This dress was one of those perfect shopping moments, when you see is full price and just cant afford it, and then see it a week later 70% off! Amazing, as if I was meant to have it!
His commentary: "People came around like at a closeout sale at the Galeria Mall."
Wet Casements – Wet Casements’s real name may be James. I’m not sure. He lives in Daegu in Korea where he teaches in a college or university, reads the newspaper, takes photos and does other stuff. Again, just a blogger whose posts I enjoy, from the excerpts and links to articles he reads, to just general commentary. Sounds a bit odd, but from what I’ve garnered from his tweets, I share a lot of the same opinions including the way I like to enjoy my music. Anyway, check him out.
FAST AND LOOSE
It is true though one must be careful in this genre. You should have a story and a message. Few people want to read a fictionalized account of how wise your grandparents were. To be incredibly crass but completely realistic, tragedy sells, but it has to be written in a way which interests many people, and something the public at large can relate to. And again it is worth repeating, once you decide to go down this path, you must be willing to lay your soul bare and express its pain as well as the joy. If you cannot do this, memoir writing is just not for you.
Whisk dry ingredients together in a medium bowl:
Here lately Quince is bored with core A, and has asked to return to Core B. So we will be starting it again where we left off.
sarva-devamayo guruḥ
(And you lefties... you have some of your own!)
Thanks for stopping by today and have a wonderful week!
Why is it that we can never convert our thoughts into words? Y’know the feeling, when you rehearse what you’re going to say and it sounds AMAZING in your head, but when you say it out loud you think to yourself: what on earth did I just say? This is the worst feeling ever. When I came out to my parents, I felt that I couldn’t express what I was feeling through words, it just wasn’t enough. It didn’t go very well to say the least. I’ve never been one who can articulate his thoughts into words very well, and I’m fine with that, but it does get me into some sticky situations. I’m going to save you the cliche coming out story for another day, and get straight to the point.
1 box spring encasement
To what extent do you feel that you have been influenced by the anti-Christian forces of modern culture? Do you think you have picked up any of the values of the League for Industrial Democracy? Unfortunately, all of us are the products of our own backgrounds. Even after we become Christians we still are influenced by our culture. We need to evaluate our presuppositions against the truth revealed in God’s Word.
From Tsumo - Shumo by Mordikai A. Hamutyinei and Albert B. Plangger
Copper: 155.40 g/tonne, is still 57% above its 2009 low of 99 g/tonne.
Liv Ullmann, Cicely Tyson and Diana Ross were first time nominees. This was the 2nd nomination for Liza Minnelli (her first one came for 1969’s The Sterile Cuckoo) and the 3rd for Maggie Smith (she had won Best Actress for her performance in 1969’s The Prime of Miss Jean Brodie and she had previously been nominated in Supporting for Othello).
If love it be towards what is perfect and
Pre season
A fellow pilot posited this to me the other day: If you were a soldier, at war, and were orderd to do something perilous which could very possibly result in your death, but was seen by your commanders as absolutely necessary, would you do it? I answered, "Yes".
I have stopped expecting to make it through a meal without my son demanding "bites" of whatever I'm having (even if he has the same thing on his plate.)
I always answer the question by saying, “Of course, what other way is there to interpret the Bible?” What is meant by sensus literalis is not that every text in the Scriptures is given a “woodenly literal” interpretation, but rather that we must interpret the Bible in the sense in which it is written.
“Never!” I declared emphatically. “Not even a person who hated my act would have dared! By God, I would have caught the egg and hurled it back with interest!”
Once you lose social, cultural, and political dominance, there is no getting it back again.
In addition to refusing to publish the information, news outlets took other steps to conceal the identities of those on the list.
Your protest mail will have an even bigger impact, because every protest mail sent before the end of this month will be printed and hand-delivered on the 3rd of May! On this date Ericka will personally deliver an incredible 76.500 emails and signatures in support of Yupi to the director of Morelia Zoo. With less than 3.500 signatures and 4 days to go, supporters from all over the world are now trying to reach 80.000 signatures.
a drop or two of water
Kathy Griffin informs readers on knowing when to try harder and when to walk away. Lisa Ling explores the idea that your childhood may not have been perfect, but it’s over, Portia de Rossi talks to accepting our bodies for what they are and loving them. Lauren Conrad tells every woman what she really needs to know, what she has learned about what she would and wouldn’t do for money or love. A small excerpt can be found on Today.com where Anne Christensen gives you her detailed list of, Something perfect to wear if the employer or man of your dreams wants to see you in an hour.
To stay in line with this vision …
From the bridge, it's about 2 1/2 miles to Henninger Flats. That's a logical turnaround point, and my first bailout point if I got tired. Normally, it's just where I turn around when I'm doing a short conditioning hike. I can do the hike from the Pinecrest entrance to Henninger Flats and back in somewhat less than two hours, so I know if I want to, I can park on Pinecrest for that. Nonetheless, I usually park down on Crescent just so I always have the option during my hike of turning around on heading on.
So how much money did squeaky clean John Stevens get from the tax payer to have an office in the UK?
woman before you pulled the news
This poem is an attempt at plagiarism. I come from poetry lessons with Robert Kelly and Diane Wakoski who taught that copying the poems of others was something like what the copyists at the Louvre did who learned from the masters. But in writing a poem, perhaps unlike painting, even when you try to copy another poet your own voice is bound to come out and no one might be the wiser as to what the original inspiration was. In an interesting project Robert Kelly wrote “into” Percy Bysshe Shelley’s “Mont Blanc,” adding his own text, thereby creating a new poem in book form, also called Mont Blanc. Diane Wakoski taught that if you take a poem and change the words to be your own, you are creating something completely new.
Well, before her first surgery, the pressure caused by the glaucoma in that eye was above 30. Dr. F (have I mentioned before how much we love her?) wanted to act quickly to lower that pressure as it needed to be below 20 to stop further damage to Darcy's optic nerve. Back in April the fact that my baby was having surgery just one month after she got home had my head spinning! But today I'm so grateful that we moved at a quick pace to have one surgery that was quickly followed by a second. That's because at her final surgery follow up exam this week, the pressure in Darcy's eye was 18. Yes, EIGHTEEN!!!
“Greetings, you who are highly favored! The Lord is with you,” Gabriel said.
-o0o-
The Polish Ministry of National Defense is embarking on the acquisition of a new transport helicopter for the Polish military, at an estimated budget of US$1 billion. This multi-phase helicopter procurement will be divided into several stages, the first will include the acquisition 26 aircraft for the Army, Navy and Air Force through 2017.
Lord Harrington died the same morning. For him, the hell wain has come after all. In his will – the one he had meant to destroy – tormented by guilt, he was admitting to his triple crime; he was recognising Christopher as his son and sole heir and was leaving to him – if he were still alive - all his fortune, but only under the condition that Christopher would produce his mother’s ring as a proof of his identity.
Instead of water cooler gossip about the weekend I got to chatter with my daughter about her day at school.
Once we moved to the Lower Mainland he became a different dog. We suspect it had much to do with his progressing cataracts. A number of times when hubby walked the boys and stopped to talk to a neighbour, Dusty would get confused when the conversation ended and follow the neighbour as they parted. He had the softest hair on his face and ears. He would come to the couch when Dad was watching tv and rest his head in dad’s lap and let him stroke and gently pull on his cheeks and loose skin between and above his eyes.
Prior to the opening of Quotidian Theatre Company’s next play, Brian Friel’s Irish drama Dancing at Lughnasa, several actors in the cast are writing here about various experiences they have during the rehearsal process.
Time to post again! Hooray! In my new-found sense of clarity, I’m trying to adjust and become an all-around different person. After all, the only thing constant is change. You either change, and adapt, or you get left behind. Adaptation is something that I have become a pro at. Whether or not I feel like I fit in, I can blend into any situation, with any group of people, in any setting, much like a chameleon. You can’t move around as much as I have without learning how to get along with a variety of different personalities.
1 bag of baby carrots
Elsewhere Nottingham, Manchester and Coventry all voted No to the PM's plan to have elected Mayors. A referendum on in Birmingham is likely to produce the same result. That, I must admit, is excellent news. We do not need any more layers of politicians directly elected by a small proportion of the population who have no real power but lots of money for waste and corruption.
Not to go all political on you, but we took Iran to task recently for doing that very thing, did we not?
Settling into a new job. Which is a pretty amazing one. It involves hospitals, helping people and that.
I might think I am more or less the same person as I was last year – a little older, a little heavier, a little greyer, but essentially still me – and yet only 2% of me is the same as the person who wrote about photographing The Sex Pistols Experience tribute band 12 months ago.
I will tell you, though, that I wouldn’t trust that man. I hope I’m not being uncharitable, but any person who has amassed that much money and power has to have done it on the backs of other people. I just can’t see any way around it. It’s not like you wake up one day and are magically an unimaginably wealthy media tycoon who can do whatever you want with impunity.
My Husband: Really? I thought we didn't have a name picked out it if had been a boy.
Start to create small stitch samples of tucks, pleats and darts for Sketchbook project 2012, work in my own sketchbook to the same theme (stitches and folds) in preparation for my own work
Prayer: Jesus, You did not come to be right. You didn’t even have to be born or die for me. You came to serve. Help me to see that pouring oil is another way to emulate You a little more. Please clean out pride from my heart and replace it with the desire to honor You above myself. Amen.
“I tore it October 1 playing against Florida in the third or fourth quarter,” said Chapman. “I was told that I could have surgery or keep on playing the season. I still had stability left in my knee and I wanted to win a championship. Pain is one of those temporary things. A lot of people have pain in the game of football, but I just had to do what I had to do.”
So where an organisation is a corporation, it can be regulated under the corporations power, but apart from that, there is no power to regulate their activities.
Thanks for looking and have a Marvelous Monday!
This is clearly a spend more and stay on austerity track sum of the kind often dished out during elections. In real terms, it’s a fantasy. In Troika circles, it represents dangerous anti-matter.
On the morning of the third day an angel came and rolled away the stone at the entrance to the tomb. The guards were very frightened, and they fell down as if they were dead.
9. More often than not, can you guess the end of the book within the first five chapters of the book?
Off to pick up the brother, and said items.
He goes on to explain that these clauses ban students from becoming associated in “any ways to any activities that may be considered detrimental to the stakes of the government and nation”.
P.P.S. I know I've been accused of nitpicking, and arguing about semantics when I talk about words I use, words I like and dislike, and all that. But the fact remains, I find this subject both interesting and *personally* important, so I can't help but nitpick and complain about terms on occasion!
Gather together our scattered people, free those who are slaves among the Gentiles, look kindly on those who are despised and detested, and let the Gentiles know that you are our God.
Intelligent Design is the understanding that the complexity, beauty and composition of this world is the work of an intelligent mind as opposed to a random, non-purposeful chain of events. Creationists believe that this Intelligent Designer is God.
But in the end just me.
1 cup oil for frying
What will you be for Halloween?
My incredible coworkers have arranged to feed me every night until I return to work on Wednesday next week! What a huge relief it is to not have to prepare any meals. I know and appreciate so much how lucky I am to be part of a team that cares and supports me so much. I haven't had to worry about missing any of the days of work that I've had to because they always find someone to cover me, even though I've long since used up all of the PTO I had accrued.
And things don’t just stop there! Last year, the government fired more than 30,000 of its employees! This means that 30,000 people (many with families to feed) were suddenly left job less. Simply because the government wants to keep as much cash as they can to themselves. They say they will use this money to square out the governments’ debt, but we all know that isn’t so. The money is being used for hiring more police men, buying more guns, and pepper spray, for new police cars with dark windows, so we can’t see who is driving them. The money is being used to fund the ever growing militia.
19 lbs 10 1/2 oz
While I don’t particularly support the war because all war is such a cruel thing, I do think that it is nice that we can pay our respects to our fallen soldiers and offer up a public symbol of that respect through our town of Wootton Bassett.
Back to Easter. As usual, Miss Emma squealed when a package arrived from Aunt Kristin. Inside of a princess backpack, Emma found flower-shaped pancake molds, a bunny plate, pink pancake mix, and pink strawberry syrup. She was giddy! She and mommy made these for breakfast on Saturday morning. Emma loved them!
The kitchen came with mustard appliances, which I used as a jumping off point. To complement the mustard, I chose to add grey and aqua along with a healthy dose of white to balance the dark cabinets that Vicki wasn't fond of. Here is the result:
"Let’s have the decency to let tween girls have their own little world of vampires and child wizards and games you play when hungry."
I only have one thing to say to you: “Much more than a Grammy award, that’s how much you mean to me.”
Also, his writing of love, and the ties between love and sacrifice, was revealing. I think if he so desired, Dickens could have written an entire book on this subject in itself. One might even go so far as to say that he did. I suggest it for historic purposes, as well as for simple interest. But whatever you read it for, you can be certain it will change you, and I hope, for the better.
Okay, maybe that's a little too strict. We'll let her see boys at forty-five. If she double dates.
He said he was expecting an ocean-view room.
Mr Ramatlhodi seems to forget that the 1996 Constitution was drafted by an elected constituent assembly dominated by the ANC. In addition, it reflects a very wide-ranging consensus that the new South Africa should be a constitutional democracy in which Parliament and the Cabinet would have to act in accordance with constitutional principles and provisions, failing which both law and executive action could be set aside by a Constitutional Court charged with the task of upholding the Constitution at all times.
To think that "good Christian girls" are immune would be doing your children a great disservice. As we discussed in Girlhood Interrupted, according to experts, prior to adolescence, a child’s primary influencer is his or her’s parents (or guardians.) There is no cognitive thinking of consequences. That part of the brain isn’t developed yet. There is simply, “Mommy said no,” or, “Daddy said stop." Children are influenced by what we as parents require, demand, control, encourage, motivate, discipline, etc.
I was helpfully informed that if I switched to Ortho Tri-Cyclen rather than Ortho Tri-Cyclen Lo, I could save over $72 on my birth control co-pay.
Eric Roberts/Mickey Rourke (The Pope of Greenwich Village)
Prediction:
All of this makes a nonsense of tiresome debates at the despatch box and on Newsnight about the technicalities of recession: we are financially and mentally in a depression – and heading for a slump. But one sector of London life is bucking the trend: houses and apartments above £6M. Chelsea, for example, is having a mini-boom…and there, the restaurants are heaving. My elder daughter works in upmarket sales and rentals. She tells me they’ve never been so busy – dealing with billionaire bankers, Arabs, Russians and Asian entrepreneurs desperate to buy anything that’s big, flash and relatively handy for the City, marinas and office space they all seek.
do me in ... take me out ... and make my day
But as I've researched the recent hysteria surrounding "pink slime", I've discovered that the reality more closely resembles the second picture than the first. So what is "pink slime," and why am I so okay with feeding it to my family even after so many people have been quick to condemn it?
Think of a Four Star General. What comes to your mind? A person who can inspire? Check. Somebody brilliant? Check. A problem-solver? Check. Athletic? Check. An efficiency expert? Check. A person who cares about the people working for them? Check.
I think we're being lied to again.
It's part dystopian, part post-apocolyptical, and part contemporary. If you like any of those YA genres, I urge you to read Ashfall, by Mike Mullin.
“This mad sea shows his teeth tonight.
“How can this man give us his Flesh to eat?”
Without Gin, Hotaru, who has always appeared much more mature than other girls her age, takes another step into adulthood by experiencing grief and loss. But not rejection. There is a beauty in their relationship, in a way that despite losing her first love, it could hardly be taken as traumatic, given all the time they spent in honest fun. Everything was worth it.
In an earlier post New York cops behaving badly I reported that Emily Good was charged with Obstructing Governmental Administration in the Second Degree. As a result of these charges she was arrested by the Rochester Police. I am now happy to report that this past Monday the charge was dropped. First Assistant District Attorney ,Sandra Doorley, said “For Good and her supporters, the dismissal of the criminal charge was proof that she had been wronged when she was arrested by Rochester police.”
she inhaled the sweet air of freedom, and
it does looks similar to this one with the beadboard walls. I have an old garage sale mirror I plan on revamping and installing in my bath. Hope you enjoy my inspiration too!
I almost had one of those rolls today. I chose an ’85 (4/27/85 Frost Amphitheater, Palo Alto, CA) to start off the morning. The 80′s are a giant tushee: fun around the edges, but dangerous in the middle. (I apologize for that.)
praise the good points at least 5 times a day
Pro-lifers David and Darlene went to the Planned Parenthood location on Division and LaSalle to pray and counsel last Thursday. This location performs abortions six days a week, but usually pro-lifers are only there on Saturdays. This means the “clinic escorts” (”deathscorts”) are also only there on Saturdays. Coming mid-week, then, means pro-lifers can have uninterrupted conversations with clients.
Pose started as an iPhone App but now they have a running website too! So if you don't have an iPhone, that's not an excuse!!!
